3 cups confectioners’ sugar
When satisfied with my image, I saved my file into a .tif and placed it in Illustrator. I do this because I despise working with typography in Photoshop, Illustrator is much better for this kind of work. There I then added the copy, going back to slightly tweak the background image in Photoshop a couple of times until it worked out best for the space. The typeface I used is from the Neutraface family, a font which I adore!
"I'll be seeing you," said William. He got up and walked to the door, where he paused a moment to look back at Jane and his father. Their faces had gone suddenly blank, which made him feel worse than he had felt for a long time.
Check out this stat right on the bottle....
Just like you can remember where you were when you heard about the twin towers on 9-ll, I remember where I was when I found out Kurt Cobain died, and today when I heard that Adam MCA Yauch from the Beastie Boys died, I felt like I was hearing this news about a childhood BFF. I immediately started crying when I read the Facebook status (yes, that was my major news source) that mentioned his death. Don't worry, I don't normally cry when celebrities who I don't know in real life die, but there is something different about certain musicians. You hear their voices whispering to you through your headphones so often that you come to feel like they are part of your life. I spent a lot of my childhood fighting for my right to party, and just as I decided to grow up, the B-Boy's music grew up a little bit too.
Stamp: Magnolia
not, at this point, placing any bets.
31. Touche Turtle
The steel-clad building amongst the trees seems incongruous with its surroundings, but having shown my membership card at the entrance and passed into the vast dimly-lit space beyond, its purpose becomes apparent: to protect what is one of the most remarkable and best-preserved discoveries in this outpost of the Empire, Lullingstone Roman Villa. From beginnings in around AD100, the villa began as quite a modest building, probably four rooms linked by a north-south corridor with protruding wings at either end. By the mid 2nd century, the house had been enlarged to include a bath house to the south and further rooms to the north. Then in the 3rd century the north wing was demolished and rebuilt with five rooms, three of which featured underfloor heating.
Army Pfc. Richard E. Clapp, 19, of Seattle, Wash., will be buried April 25, at Arlington National Cemetery near Washington, D.C. On Sept. 2, 1950, Clapp and the C Company, 1st Battalion, 27th Infantry Regiment came under fire near Yulchon, South Korea, and Clapp was killed in action. The Army was unable to identify his remains at the time, and the remains were buried as "Unknown" in a military cemetery on the Korean Peninsula. In 1951, the U.S. consolidated cemeteries on the peninsula. The unknown remains were interred in the National Memorial Cemetery of the Pacific. In 2011, due to advances in identification technology, the remains were exhumed for identification. Scientists from the Joint POW/MIA Accounting Command and the Armed Forces DNA Identification Laboratory used circumstantial evidence and forensic identification tools such as radiograph comparison, and dental records to identify Clapp.
Sustrans, 119 Holloway Head, Birmingham, B1 1QP.
2nd release of UK HC punx Nerves. First release was a split 7" with the great Substandard. Substandard's singer is now in Constant State Of Terror. I've even seen Substandard with a complete different line-up on a festival in Nottingham called Rock'n Reggae. But that's a very long time ago. Try to get the discography album.
Want to know what this movie is about?
…Chaos everywhere. Kovalevski goes for top rope stunner. Reversed by James. James for her finisher…but Kovalevski grabs her…TWO HANDED FACE CLAW! Rowe in the ring. McGill tackles her…KATAHAJIME! James taps.
When children see their parents are truly in love, they gain a sense of security and well being. The atmosphere of the home changes, because order is now how it should be. When you’re a radiant bride that your husband is proud to call his, you are a jewel in his crown.
Hopefully, you will be touched by words that will evoke personal thoughts and ideas. As these thoughts surface, write them down. Such thoughts could trigger a poem, a story, a personal reflection: Who knows when someone somewhere in time might read them and how a life might be touched in the process.
This giveaway will expire at 10pm, EST on Sunday, December 17th.
So, I’m a slave… now what?
G'dou G'dou (Show Boat)
A smile spread across my face when I heard this tale tonight. So she does love me after all, I selfishly thought to myself.
I think I actually wear more maxi-dresses in the winter than the summer, which is the reverse of most people, but there is something really exciting about a long skirt in winter and a crumpled glamour about the possibility of getting the hem wet and dirty.
I'm not sure what the right thing to do following something like this, because I'm not often a shit bag.
Vicki: All the full-timing RVers and one extended traveler had their rigs equipped with solar panels and inverters. The two remaining extended travelers did not see any need for them.
Heres a look at some of the exercises I did this week!
It was nearly dark when I arrived so I put up my tent, gathered some firewood and got a nice fire going before cooking dinner. I spent a wonderfully relaxing evening just enjoying the fire. The moon was beautiful that evening and the moonlight made amazing patterns coming down through the trees.
Today is a somber day in my home. We’ve had a bit of a tragedy come into our lives. I know, I know… as if this family needs any more stress, right? But, alas, sunny days of yore have come to an abrupt halt. Lelo may have killed a man. I am wringing my hands as I write. (Well, that is not technically possible, but the picture of angst is clear.)
In the mean time, I'm getting on a ride now, so I will have to finish this post later. I hope I do it with a microbrew in my hand.
Everton came to town. Thanks for giving us 3 hard earned points.
The weather has turned and it has finally cooled down and the oppressive humidity has left. Instead we are enjoying the cool winds of change and pulling out those comforters for cozy nights and coccoon sleeping. Winter is inevitably on its way so I need to go buy some cozy socks. That always makes me happy. I won't turn on the heaters until frost bite starts to set in. Open windows and fresh air are hard to give up.
Donkey - The character finds a wandering pack animal with packs and saddlebags full of 2d6 days of rations and water.
and that's the haps around here!
We’d met out somewhere one night…exchanged numbers…had a whirlwind “relationship” which consisted of a few texts and a date which never happened…because he canceled at the last minute…because he decided to get back together with his ex-girlfriend.
She discovered a great many problems in my blood chemistry, not the least of which was glucose at pre-diabetic levels. As well, I have acidosis which is a highly acidic body chemistry, high sodium levels, high potassium levels, too many liver enzymes, high cholesterol and anemia from very low iron.
Thick sliced bread (preferably brioche or challah)
For Ten People:
I just want to thank my sweet "sister," Carla, and my sweet friend, Kelly, for organizing the event. You both know the power of prayer in different ways in your lives and I have been blessed to hold you both up in prayers. I know you don't want thanks, but you have no idea what that 30 minutes did for me! Well, maybe you DO understand. ;)
Cain has announced that he is suspending his campaign because of the barrage of sexual harassment and marital infidelity claims that have been levied against him in the last few weeks. Cain made the decision after having had a long conversation with his wife and several girlfriends. Final score? Girlfriends 1, Cain 0. Cain learned that it is very difficult to profess to being a devout family man when you are accused of a life of lewd sexual behavior by several woman who are not your wife. At least Cain will not have to submit to that lie detector test which he volunteered for last month.
Stuff into pita pockets and serve. (sprinkle with toasted sesame seeds if desired).
Over the years Sam Walton and Sam Gaynor would rename the effort and transfer efforts under a new name incorporated as, “We Care Media Arts”. The two were successful also in partnering with the prestigious Columbia University in their documentary studies efforts and had a relationship with many interns in the film and oral history program. This relationship provided tremendous opportunity and many successful recordings of the people of Harlem and their personal memories of dynamic local leaders and intriguing elders from many historic eras. Columbia University documentary studies students and Sam Walton and Sam Gaynor were a fabulous team.
1/8 t freshly ground black pepper
He played for about 2hours 30mins, where his playlist consisted of tracks from the Album “Larger than House” and those of other artists. On the album he has only worked with local DJs/Producers, with the likes of SK95 and Pheli’s very own DJ Million just to name a few.
He was consistently among the world’s top 400 men throughout his career with season’s bests of 44.71 (‘92), 44.45 (‘93), 44.43 (‘94), 44.23 (‘97), 44.40 (‘98), and 44.21 (‘99) before the 2000 season (44.57). So unfortunately while many will remember the negative note that his career ended on, there was much success long before the end. My recollection of the positive aspects of his career is not to dismiss the negative, but to remind that he was as any man with both positive and negative in his life – and in this case his career.
I was level 50 when we went into the zone, while Gaff and Lurk mentored down to 50. This made all NPCs level 40 and above green to us (which meant all of the named mobs in DFC, which meant AA credit for killing them) but most of the other mobs were grey. A few patrolling and guard mobs were 40, but the rest of the zone was greyed out to us, so not aggro.
When we go over them I am allowed to make suggestions or say if something doesn't work for me or if I feel uncomfortable. My opinion is heard, but He makes the final decision.
So, I beg of you, do not go there. You have begun some marvelous, uplifting projects — and in this I speak to all the people of Earth. You began the process of collective compassion, and you did so, for example, in your Occupy movements. And it was not simply Wall Street, because you may also think of Arab Spring as an Occupy movement. Think of the shifts that are happening every single day as shifts in consciousness, and what you are permitting, allowing, creating, and what you are calling forth.
The entire xXx global frenzy will be broadcast live on Diesel.com. Users will be able to click in real time on any party around the world and see spectacular images, making the xXx event a truly interactive experience.
The people of Greece are bravely rising up against social terror policies. Demonstrations, as well as general strikes, become more and more frequent, despite the violent repression and the media’s deafening silence.
'Oh, man, here we go again...'
Taylor’s key-ring, still in the ignition, jingled like tiny chimes.
Around the world today, those of us who tat and appreciate fine needle-arts – and each other – are pausing to remember Regina Brummett, also known as the “Tatting Goddess.” Whether she gave herself that name or it came from elsewhere, it was an accurate description of someone who tatted a great deal, accompanied by an immense curiosity for how things would work, how a pattern might be adapted, put to good use in a variety of needlework projects or gift-giving opportunities.
Well I had a great sewing weekend! Sorry, housework lost out again ... LOL
Now, Eva Rose is still new enough at this that it still deserves a declaration, a viewing, a hug, some praise, and a piece of candy. And truly, considering the long hard road we traveled to get here, she may still be earning a piece of candy in high school.
The problems with this diet, apart from the fact that it seems very unbalanced and extremely dull to me, is that it would make for an entirely unsociable life. I think it is a stay-at-home-alone-program. The simple pleasure of eating what we traditionally view as healthy would be removed.... What about blueberries and cherries....how could I give those up?... I love my salads in the summer and my soups in the winter....I can't imagine my plate consisting of a sad and solo chicken breast or a lonely little sea bass....
Johnson comes through in the biographical essay mostly through quotes from his letters and publications. Here, for example, is Johnson's take on having to write a regular column in one of his magazines (advice which may also apply to the occasional blogger): "He that condemns himself to compose on a stated day, will often bring to his task an attention dissipated, a memory embarrassed, an imagination overwhelmed, a mind distracted with anxieties, a body languishing with disease: he will labour on a barren topic, till it is too late to change it; or, in the ardour of invention, diffuse his thoughts into wild exuberance, which the pressing hour of publication cannot suffer judgement to examine or reduce."
What our brother John Piper said about his wife Noël, is what every man who is married to a daughter of the King, should be able to say about his wife. Has my husband always been able to say this about me? Absolutely not! During the first years of our marriage, I was a very strong-willed, opinionated, Pharisaical, loud and boisterous woman who demanded to be heard, respected, romanced and highly esteemed! Okay, I know you want to laugh, and you can. Believe me, I do. When I remember how ungodly I behaved, yet expected to be well-loved and cherished, it really makes me laugh. I was basically questioning why my husband couldn't and wouldn't snuggle up to a thornbush! This only confirms that when someone is not walking with God and disobedient to His commands, they are completely illogical and out of their minds. I can say this with assurance because, as you can see, I’ve been there.
02 Somewhere
I’m Truckertucker, that’s my opinion, it ought to be yours!
Art Direction: Maurice Carter
Now these are just bizarre. This campy late-‘80s sci-fi midnight movie boasts creature make-up that’s not exactly scary as it is ugly. The most memorable part of this movie, where the alien Klowns hi-jack ice cream trucks and kill people with cotton candy missiles, is the grotesque faces of the villains. They giggle and shake and destroy you with sugary goodness. You’ll have a good time, but you’ll have no idea what the hell you’re watching. BEST MOMENT: The Klowns lure our protagonists into a demonized funhouse tent for the finale.
Abby sighed. Her mother looked worse for the wear, eager for news of her runaway daughter yet prepared to give Zanna a piece of her mind for the way things had played out this morning. And wouldn’t it be just like her little sister to slip in and smooth things over with benign Bishop Gingerich rather than face their mamm and Sam’s wife, who’d worked just as hard at preparing for their four hundred guests? “No, it’s not like that. Vernon’s decided worship should go on, followed by the meal, rather than wastin’ everybody’s time and all this gut food we’ve cooked. We’d better get ourselves seated now, so he can start.”
QLD 4566
I've lots of analyses of 19th century Pale Ales. But they aren't much help. Brettanomyces wasn't identified until just after 1900. So no hard evidence, just guesswork and supposition. And you know how keen I am on that as a research method.
“This pan religious perspective may prove especially important where our global civilization’s responsibility for the earth is concerned…Native American religions, for instance, offer a rich tapestry of ideas about our relationship to the earth…All things are connected like the blood that unites us all.” (Al Gore, Earth in the Balance – Ecology and the Human Spirit, 1992, p. 258-259)
Thursday, October 14th @ 7 p.m.
Dance me to your beauty with a burning violin
The biggest challenge was figuring out how to get these babies glued together and stacked in a way that they would dry without sliding apart. My solution, as you can see in the above photo, was to stack the clear plastic packaging they came in, with the balls glued together inside. These sat overnight to make sure they were good and dry, and the next day I just plopped them right into the urns...
For fun, try not to use your dominate hand for just 15 minutes during your day. I was going to say try not to use it all day, but that seems unfair. Just 15 minutes. (Hint, open the wine bottle before you start the 15 minute exercise- you will be glad you did- lol!)
As Jenny mentions in the video - never use tinned tomatoes - as most of the cans are lined with BPA and the acidity in the tomatoes leaches this toxic substance.
The advertisement, it appears, was an inside joke by whoever designed it for America’s Favorite Coupon Book, which distributes monthly coupon books in various Florida counties.
When they were brought to Edinburgh, the only evidence against Cuthill was that he had been armed in suspicious circumstances. Had Cuthill acknowledged the authority of the King and Council, then he could have expected to spend some time in Edinburgh’s tolbooth before being liberated under caution on the conditions that they lived orderly and did not attend field preachings.
That reflux is a normal and unfortunate occurrence in most preemies,
French jazz pianist Colin Vallon’s ECM debut is the third disc under his own name, following Les Ombres in 2004 and a disc on the Hatology label, Ailleurs in 2007. Needless to say, an appearance on ECM gives this trio a certain credibility – or cache (more on that later) – and an international presence the previous discs have not offered.
6 images per month (Images are yours to keep and use for non-commercial
I will upload other cards that I made prior to my holiday but for now, I hope you'll like what I've shared. :)
“Drink! Drink!” he yelled.
I finally got around to doing some night photography in York - I don't know why but I've always liked the view of cities and night and particularly the bring and colourful lights. I'm looking forward to when winter really sets in with cold, foggy, air and the light, warmth, and sounds of people enjoying themselves spilling from the houses and buildings in the city. I think I'm thinking Victorian Christmas here which I should really stop doing as it's only September!
Separated from God, my body burns like an oven,
teach your kids that as a result of failing to respond to the attack on the USS Cole, the embassy bombings in kenya and tanzania, and the first world trade center attack, we led our enemies to believe we were weak, further emboldening them.
But the paper continues to dampen.
I walk with you and I can be “me” with no fear of being chastised or made to change.
8pm. Another day, another treadmill hike! This week, I’ve started including some sprint intervals which do not seem to further aggravate my back–hip hip hooray! Since the onset of my back pain, my workouts have looked quite different–I’ve shifted from mostly strength training to entirely cardio. While I do miss my sessions in the weight room, I’ve found a new appreciation for the treadmill; I’m just grateful to be able to get my sweat on, however it may be! And, I must say that I don’t miss trying to bust my sore butt up the hill to class the day after a leg workout!
Not a right of birth
If you would like to invite him to speak for your organization and/or school during the weekend, feel free to contact him at 09063628123 or email him at Myron.S.Sta.Ana@hotmail.com
And he got really narked when I said for the 50th time, "If you're too hot, poppet, you can take your hoodie off."
I love surprises!
At this moment I’m making a choice. Will you choose with me? I am choosing to quiet those voices.
A few Labour sops to the press are only intended as distractions. £288 million "added" to the NHS Wales budget is simply a slowing of £1 billion in cuts already proposed, and will quickly be destroyed by inflation which is running at 5%. An extra £1 million for the environment consists in reality of £4 million added to subsidise incineration, and £3 million cut from other areas to make up the difference. A new jobs fund will create at most 4,000 minimum wage jobs over three years -- a sticking plaster which won't even make up for the jobs lost as a result of the Assembly's other cuts.
because I get that, if only that:
“The worst trade of my childhood” – Senor Solly
So, I had written my New Year's resolutions. So far I've managed to completely give up on one, stick to one and half-ass the other.
For more information contact:
4 give
In the final episode of the 1994 X-Men cartoon series, Xavier is incapacitated by an assassination attempt. Wolverine, Cyclops and Jean Grey go to his mutant island of Genosha and try to plead for his help. After a small skirmish, and hearing the facts he concedes knowing full well that Xavier would do anything to help him. In an episode of the cartoon Wolverine and the X-Men, when a comatose Xavier washes up on the shores of Genosha he takes him in and cares for him as a guest and offers to let him and the other X-Men stay. They decline his offer and he lets them leave, with his blessing. In the movie X:Men: The Last Stand, Magneto appears just as upset over Xavier’s death as Wolverine and Storm. Then when a mutant punk named Pyro tells him he would have killed Xavier had Magneto given the order, Magneto shuts him down, saying, in all sincerity “Charles Xavier did more for mutant kind then you’ll ever know.”
He showed my great-grandfather’s round spectacles, still in the family, and an engraved gold watch which he told me to keep.
Yes, and you were obviously a judge in the pageant for the casting of ‘Miss Guiding Light’.
(if frozen, do not thaw before baking)
“A summer visit on a dark lonely night illuminates the vacuous sky with a warm greeting, not wishing to wear out its welcome, but teasing me for want of another.”
I am not defined by the person people see when they look at me. I am defined by the way I have lived my life, the decisions and mistakes I’ve made, the consequences I have lived through and the way I have handled the hurdles life has thrown my way.
Well, he read it and made this small wish come true (thanks honey!), together with my dear, dear, talented friend Bjørke, she made the beautiful embroidery specially for me. How cool is that?
cl = cluster (combining 2 or more stitches in one space/stitch, example: 3 dc in one stitch = cluster)
"Yeah, Bell. Or that other guy. Before. You know," he turned to his partner.
On May 16th, the Maynard H. Jackson Jr. International Terminal will open at Hartsfield-Jackson Atlanta International Airport (ATL). This state-of-the-art, LEED-certified terminal will accommodate more passengers and make international travel a breeze.
Icing these mini ruffle cakes with a pastry bag is actually much easier than creating a smooth layer with an offset spatula. Especially if you don't bother with sticking a layer of cheesecake in between the cake layers like I did. My main excuse for making these mini cakes is that I'm determined to find as many ways of using my new mini-cheesecake pan as possible. Since each cake comes out of the pan with a narrow, evenly sized height, unlike a cupcake, you can create mini individualized cakes by using this pan without as much fuss.
Having lived and worked in the Caribbean and in different states of the US exposed Aníbal to various environments and lots of people. I wondered if he recommended working abroad to get a different perspective and enhance creativity. His point of view wasn’t what I expected to hear but nonetheless, very logical, “We live connected now, so even if you don’t work abroad you are heavily exposed to global work, to good work (and bad too). You can learn from it even if you haven’t been there. Just have to look for it.” On the other hand, living in different places and having unique experiences makes you “interesting”, which have been stressed by advertising professionals everywhere.
* God can not die, but Jesus, being a man could die but only once. A “re-sacrifice” of Jesus Christ for our sins, or a “re-offering / re-presentation” of His sacrifice is not necessary. Scripture says, that Jesus died “once for all” and does not need to be sacrificed again (Hebrews 10:10; 1 Peter 3:18). Hebrews 7:27 declares, “Unlike the other high priests, He (Jesus) does not need to offer sacrifices day after day, first for his own sins, and then for the sins of the people. He sacrificed for their sins once for all when He offered Himself.” The bread and the wine are symbols of the body and blood of Jesus, but are not a representation of God nor His body or his blood (Because God is a ghost and has no body or blood as human beings.) The bread Jesus was breaking represented what he was going to do. The same for the wine he gave them – his blood hadn’t yet been shed, but the wine represented the blood that would be shed. These words were not meant to be taken in a literal sense then, nor are they now.
After you have spotted and soaked up the pet stain, the best option for your floors is to get them professionally cleaned. Over-the-counter products and regular dish soap can potentially ruin your floors. Plus, depending on how long the pet stain has been there, it could have potentially soaked down into the padding. Before your professional comes over, soak up as much of the stain as you can.
The bathroom has a zillion, you know.
Don’t bluff khaleesi…lucky for her at least one of those merchants is curious enough about the possibility of dragons to side with the saucy Targaryen girl.
Heat large nonstick skillet over medium-low heat for 4 minutes. Meanwhile, heat large pot or Dutch oven over medium-low heat for 4 minutes. Brush tops of sandwiches with melted butter and place in skillet buttered side down. Brush bottoms of rolls with remaining butter and use preheated pot to compress sandwiches for 15 to 20 seconds. Cook (keeping pot on sandwiches but not pressing down) until first side is golden brown, 3 to 5 minutes. Remove pot, flip sandwiches over, replace pot on top of sandwiches, and cook until golden brown, 3 to 4 minutes. Cut in half and serve immediately.
More recently, Khai’s counsel has been sought outside the industry. He has addressed the World Economic Forum (WEF), worked with the UN Secretary-General, and served on the Singapore Prime Minister’s Economic Review Committee. He is a faculty member at Steinbeis University, Berlin, and a board member of Agencies in Action, a non-profit organisation that helps feed the hungry in New York City.
“Emergency Flare, for when you get stuck on The Wall and need rescuing?” – Cheek!
Sometimes, in the heat of this "not-yet-summer" weather you just need a cookie that doesn't include chocolate! I mean, don't get me wrong. Chocolate chips cookies are the number one fave around these parts but this one's so good, too.
The night it all begins to change for Victoria Frost is no different than usual. She spends it seducing another woman’s husband, easing up beside him and lingering there like too much perfume. And that quickly for him, his wife is forgotten. The ensuing conversation is an erotically-charged game of cat and mouse. Afterward, Victoria moves away feeling all the more sorry for mistreated wives and all the more angry at women who aid and abet these cheaters.
TWO – I have found that every time people in a church says something like what was mentioned above it is simply because they do not know anyone that is lost!!”
1 x (2901)Harpic Hygiene Block (Lavander) = 3.85
Friends~I just realized that the school year is super close to being over! I don't know how this happened so fast...without me noticing. I was just planning away for next week and there it was...the end of April. It got me thinking about what I can do to keep my kiddos on track this summer. We just finished out reading and math bench marks and while my kiddos rocked them I know how easily they can lose it by not practicing over the summer.
I had to interject, “What Frenchman, Ryan? Why would I find a Frenchman? What are you talking about???”
Nothing about any of that is weird. The weird part is that she's married to the guy that I once was convinced would be MY husband one day.
So on to Ted, the last of the ‘great’ senators and the clan’s weakest link. I suppose he deserves the accolade of greatness simply for being around long enough, the Methuselah of the upper house. And what a variety of super liberal and semi-socialist causes he embraced, making lots of sound and fury in the process that signified nothing. Was it enough to wipe away the shame of Chappaquiddick, the shame of leaving a nineteen-year-old woman to drown while he made his escape, the shame of failing to report the incident for hours after? For some it seems to have been, for Super Obama it seems to have been, but not for Mordred; no, never.
You hang with the boys for fun and play.
If you want to leave your footprints on the moon, you must return to God, the Potter and ask Him to show you what destiny He had in mind when He was creating you. Submit to His shaping and moulding. Allow Him to fire you up.
Whew... I've never felt more like Santa after writing a post... lol
bounce
Oh my god, they just took a step closer and spread out more. They are blocking every possible direction between me and the road. We are too low to be seen by passing cars. Why didn’t I notice everyone else leave? If I scream I wonder if anyone will hear me. What if I can’t scream, like in those dreams? They just moved toward me again. This is like a bizarre game of chess. One is grabbing his crotch, no, is he? He IS looking at me, into my eyes, they are ALL looking into my eyes… there is no way that is not a signal. Is this how it ends? It can’t be. It’s not fair, it can’t be, I have overcome far too much for it to end this way. Jamoka will be scarred for life by what he sees, or he could get killed trying to help me. SHIT. Who will take him in if he makes it? Dianna?
to when Tim and I were first married.
Yeah the Cross has proven
Yesterday he suggested MI6 had learned there were times when it should be open.
I have lots of thoughts about my Texas trip (which seems about as substantial as a dream now) . . . the Royal Wedding tea party that my daughter is hosting tomorrow . . . the new class that I am teaching . . . all of the books I have read in the past month . . . and whoopie pies with clotted cream and strawberry jam. These thoughts are Wordsworthian, though -- and I require a bit more tranquility (rather scarce at the moment) to bring them forth.
I’ll weigh in tomorrow and tell you what I know. I’ll hope for the best and just keep doing my best.
For the next challenge, Shimelle challenged us to use grey, yellow and one other colour. I used pink, to be totally out of character!
Look at the contemporary situation in the EU today. Britain fears a European plot to hijack its core business of financial services. The French remain implacably opposed to British attempts to break up the Common Agricultural Policy – from which France is by far the largest beneficiary. The Germans refuse to accept the manana mentality of the ClubMed States. There is a ruthless Franco-German determination that their banking businesses shall not crumble under the ClubMed strain. Brussels changes the rules on dark beer production by Ireland to aid its own flagging White Beer business.
Just sayin'....
Dear Heavenly Father, thank You that as we gather in Your Name, Your power is present to provide what You have promised. Lead us Lord, to be passionate people of prayer. Teach us to cry out on behalf of a nation in need, so that we may see You heal our land. Destroy diseases, heal hurts, and turn hearts to You, who hold us all in Your hands. May Your kingdom come and Your will be done, on earth as it is in heaven. Amen.
i love the notion of using less medicine and more natural remedies. i love the idea that some of it could be foraged. i've also found a great foraging resource in the first ways blog, which i also follow on facebook. (i'm increasingly finding facebook useful and not only social, are you?).
Kowalksi says it’s been that way since the company began 175 years ago: “We were a young country, growing very rapidly. Luxury here was defined not as something aristocratic, not as something that excluded people, but rather we had an inclusive, welcoming vision of luxury.”
And just for fun (not required) tell your favorite thing about Christmas. I think mine these days is having all my kids home.
We settled on the obvious choice. Climate change! Because everyone loves to argue about that, right? Or alternately, to freak out about it and stock mad piles of canned goods and inflatable rafts in their attics? (here's looking at you, Mayor Bloomberg)
Ordering from NaturalSkinShop.com:
Iggy Pop has vowed to stop stagediving after suffering a nasty fall at a recent show.
“In order to really work it to your advantage on the job, become a standout — do something in the company that no one else is doing that adds value. Trust me, if you are delivering the goods in a way that no one else is, then they will come to you.”
Remember to tip just as if the wine were part of the check. After all, the staff is still maintaining your wine.
we're having an open house at my local Michael's on March 3rd, 1pm-3pm. you can come in and meet the instructors, get info on the classes they offer, and sign up for them at a discounted price! check your local store, this will be a nation-wide thing!
Er... sorry, I can't think of a single thing.
The base is made of deep pink bazzill and layered with white and topped with some SEI DP. Across this is more white topped with more SEI and then wrapped some white crochet lace and burgundy ribbon around it. The Sweet Peas have been stamped in Memento Tuxedo Black onto X-press It Blending Card and coloured with Copic Markers (YG11, YG13, YG17, RV000, RV00, RV32, RV34, R81, R83, R85, R89). This is a big image, so I've cut it out with Grand Circle Nestabilities and matted with the Grand Scallop Circle Nestabilities and popped it up on foam tape. The sentiment is from Flourishes' Tag Lines set and has been cut out using Fancy Tags Shapeabilities. I the corners I've added a few Kasiercraft Snow Pearls.
"The Impossible Planet/The Satan Pit"
Remember to watch the placement. The lower left corner, and both right corners are great for stamping. Keep in mind that the postage will be placed in the upper right corner so only put something there that won’t be lost under the postage.
The students have been waiting to learn about Tornadoes. We did a minilesson to go along with our Wizard of Oz theme. It was probably the most favorite activity of the year so far. We began by reading the book It's a Tornado!
It's a great recycling project . I only use old T. shirts that are too damaged or stained to be passed on.....
After about 6 hours, they were done. Look at the significant size difference from the freshly sliced peppers. See how delicate they are? I just picked up the screen, rolled the peppers off the screen on to a paper towel. I then rolled the paper towel together and crushed the peppers.
Find rest. To really be at rest we must be quiet. When we are silent before God we must ask if we are really silent. Our mouth might not be moving but what about our minds. We are so very restless. It is hard to be quiet – to really be at rest—before God. Our minds tend to run to and fro. We might manage to be quiet, still and at rest for very brief times but, if we are really honest, most of us must admit to our minds or souls being restless. How do we manage to stay our mind on God? In and of ourselves this is impossible. God knows this and has given us the Gift of His Holy Spirit. If we would ask as we start our quiet time for Him to stay our mind, we will gradually learn how to keep out all the other voices (schedules, tasks, needs, etc.) and be more open to sit quietly in His Presence. The times I have been able to do this have been such a blessing that they encourage me to continue practicing being really quiet and at rest in Him. The question today is are you willing to lay all else aside for even a moment and allow yourself to be bathed in the Presence of our Almighty God?
The Sisters relied on these words and refrained from disputing the will within the six month time limit.
They repeated this unsubstantiated lie so often that eventually the Sandra Laing case was universally considered as one of the most striking examples of recessive alleles finally having recombined after several generations, and once again forming an individual reflective of racial mixing which occurred several generations previously. I did not make this up, I promise --- I found it here.
then i ruined her.
While not directly campaigning, the President toured the receding flood waters in Paterson NJ on Sunday. There, he met with local residents and promised to help in the rebuilding of the city from Hurricane Irene's relentless damage.
Frei, it seems, is an apologist for American imperialism with form. Pilger continues, outlining the regional context and roundly denouncing the US regime and reminding us that churnalism is alive and well even at the BBC.
their organizations so they are once again self-financed.self financed
In any event, we are not going to resolve the issue of origins now, and surely much more research will be required until some element of certainty surfaces as to who the originators of megalithic culture actually were. If things were certain, there would be no need of discussion.
Up ahead in the distance I see...a sign? What the hell?
13. Seriously cat owners, can't you just admit that they rule your life and are plotting the demise of the human race? You know you're just trying to get an in with them now before it is too late.
The newest member of my family, Chloe, will be able to watch television specifically tailored to her, 24 hours a day. Chloe is our three-year-old rescue dog. Up until very recently, dog owners had to feel guilty about leaving their canine children alone in the house while they went to work all day. What would the dog do? Would she get bored and start eating the sofa? Would she try to get into the trash? Would she dig up the garden? Would she spend all day moping?
Subject: HB's b'day
Listening to all these albums, reveals the fine line Pink Floyd often walked that frequently dipped into greatness. Atom Heart Mother‘s single-track A-side, the 24-minute “Atom Heart Mother Suite” reaches too hard, plodding along with its overly dramatic horns, obtrusive samples and Gilmour’s bored strumming. But then, just a year later comes “Echoes” on the B-side of Meddle. The orchestrations are gone and the band has found a place for some evocative lyrics. “Atom Heart Mother Suite” has its moments, especially during its middle guitar vs. organ jam and the softer, creepier chorus of voices. However, the grooving in it never comes close to the dynamic quality of “Echoes.” That track knows how to start soft and build dramatic crescendos with just the key players that are Pink Floyd: Waters on a soulful, solid bass, Gilmour soaring on guitar while breezily singing lead, keyboardist Rick Wright offering luscious, swinging organ bits, and drummer Nick Mason providing his decorative, scatter shot rhythms. One of Pink Floyd’s less celebrated apexes in the recording studio. I love the fact that a tremendously shot live version was caught on film for one of the most amazing Pink Floyd live videos available, Pink Floyd: Live at Pompeii (though the Meddle version eclipses its performance power):
Part of the vast Caspian Sea washes the coastline of southern Russia. It is the world’s largest body of water surrounded by land (larger than Lake Superior!). Fishers catch sturgeon, perch, and herring in the Caspian Sea and sell them in busy outdoor markets throughout Russia, in cities like Astrakhan.
Clarke added, “I felt like he was trying to break my neck.”
Elliot
Studios. This dress is our nod-to the retro-silhouette love that’s out
I had a kid.
Coastal Christmas in beachy white clay.
It sets your priorities
Ai Ling has been marked by the immortals; her destiny lies in the emperor’s palace, where a terrible evil has lived, stealing souls, for centuries. She must conquer this enemy and rescue her captive father, while mythical demons track her every step. And then she meets Chen Yong, a young man with a quest of his own, whose fate is intertwined with hers. Here is a heart-stopping, breathtaking tale for fans of action, fantasy, and romance–of anything with the making of legend.
Rev. Karen Fraser Gitlitz – Co-Chair, Ministry Representative; BC & Western Regions
“And he died for all, that those who live should no longer live for themselves but for him who died for them and was raised again. So from now on we regard no one from a worldly point of view. Though we once regarded Christ in this way, we do so no longer. Therefore, if anyone is in Christ, he is a new creation; the old has gone, the new has come! (2Cor.5:15-17)
“We will have global warming, but it’s been deferred a bit.”
We have not accounced in public the information we have been given as we have been waiting for the Police to finish their investigations and arrest the scum involved, and to make sure they did not return to their country of origin.
A generic drug is being used to save lives of our soldiers oversees, yet, it gets little attention in U.S. hospitals, where it might save even more lives, according to a new study.
They move out here, work out here, do not speak the language and get English groceries.
Nothing to write home about, but it was a milestone. I took a photo after dark and the orange-golden haze was vanquished! And, I took the picture on the automatic setting (I'm chicken) with EGO light bulbs. You can find EGO LIGHT Bulbs at Home Depot. Here’s what EGO light bulbs look like.
Once braided, transfer your loaf onto a lightly floured baking sheet. Let it sit for 30 minutes to rise for the third and last time.
Evidence of Malema’s intellectual and performance capacity is not nearly as overwhelming as his claims to macro-economic policy development and judicious governance. He failed Grades 8 and 9 at school and has no formal tertiary training. While he appears to be a highly skilled demagogue in the mould of many ANC leaders, his technical capacity for skilled governance has yet to be seen.
I like to sew stuff. :)
And yet I am not like the rest.
DOUBT OR DESPAIR.”
Hillel Levine, Professor of Sociology and Religion at Boston University and President of the International Institute for Mediation and Historical Conciliation, an NGO that works to prevent and resolve violent conflicts. He has taught at Harvard, Yale, and has held visiting professorships in Japan, China, Poland, the Soviet Union, Brazil and Israel. His five books and many articles focus on ethnic violence and approaches to conflict resolution. His research was the basis of an Oscar-winning documentary film, and two of his books are currently being made into documentaries and a feature-length film. He often gives lectures, appears on radio and television, and writes guest columns in newspapers.
Aarti: YES. I like how you say that Polk’s chapter should have been titled “Chapter on the Mexican War” because really, I think the ENTIRE SECOND HALF OF THIS BOOK was about the Mexican War much more than it was about the people. I’m sure it is interesting to military buffs, but as both of us read this book under the expectation that it was going to be about the people who drove westward expansion, the whole military detail part
Here's an example:
24. Even the word Chicka-mama doesn’t describe you! -
Of one man's capability
I: Why?
“We’ve since had people come in again asking for it that way, so we’re going to offer it this way – complete with the chip shop bottle of sauce for that authentic experience.”
Weather here is so mild it's crazy but enjoyable. In the 50's today and we may even hit the 60's tomorrow. Who said we are not in a global warming is a bit nutsy coo-coo...but that's just my opinion. Hope you are all off to a good week. I'm exhausted from dismanteling all my Christmas decos...took me over 4 hours yesterday but it's all packed away for another year. Happy week everyone and before I go I hope you will all consider starting your cards for the Valentine's drive. I'll keep you posted but it's going to start...ready, set, stamp.
6.Mustard seeds : 1/4tbsp
I used BM's Moonshine as my gray color for the walls, and used my existing white paint I had for the trim and pieces we built. When I picked up the paint from Benjamin Moore, I also grabbed their paint cards so that I could continually go back and compare the color blue and pink that I wanted for accent colors. I had the paint swatch card in my wallet and pulled it out and compared it for anything and everything that I bought to go into the nursery. It was such a great way to stay within my color palette
"Sorry about last night and this morning," she said.
I am getting antsy to get outside and walk again. The treadmill in the basement is nice, but it's pretty boring. There is a tv, but it doesn't have a cable box which makes it get about eight channels. Not to mention the fact that we have a 1930's basement. Nothing nice like people have these days. But, for the winter months it serves its purpose.
Your Mum would always wait until I turned the corner. She’d usually have tears in her eyes, just as I did and just as I do now.
On April 7, 1933, beer was again legalized. It was not until 8 months later that the entire Volstead Act was repealed allowing for the sale of wine and liquor.
Miriam in the Desert by Jacqueline Jules with illustrations by Natascia Ugliano
And I suspect that the new novel waiting to be told will reveal itself in new and surprising ways I never expected.
Blog Carnvial was repaired for a bit but is now down again, so please send in your submissions directly via email.
Gibbes’ oldest son, Lewis Reeve Gibbes, is revered at the College of Charleston as an early and influential professor of mathematics, chemistry and physics there. His also studied medicine, and published a catalogue of South Carolina plants by his mid-20s.
The actors give the film an authentic texture as does the location in rural southern Missouri where they shot the movie. On the DVD commentary Granik and cinematographer Michael McDonough talk about being influenced by the photographs of Dorothea Lange, Walker Evans, and Shelby Lee Adams.
I fumble with the door key, trusting that he is who he indicates he is. Trusting on my sixth sense that automatically assures me his is ‘okay’.
Jon Orcutt (New York Department of Transport): The future for ‘bike sharing as public transport’ in New York and elsewhere
I have been reading some other Blogs the last few days. One trend I enjoy is the "Currently" thing where you have a list of things you are currently seeing/hearing/thinking/feeling/hoping, ect. I am considering doing this too, though, to be honest I would feel just like a "follower" so I hesitate. I never liked that feeling, unless I know exactly where I am being led. Which makes me think about the less-than-glorious aspects of who I am. Next topic. ;)
"I'm glad you liked my comments on the problems of pushing highly individual works of art down distribution channels designed to handle a standard product.
Jachelle: Brienne! Her agony over losing Renly followed by her pledging herself to Catelyn, UGH MY HEART. BRIENNE I LOVE YOU. I admit, I’m not Catelyn’s biggest fan, but this development just made her SO MUCH MORE INTERESTING OH MY LORD. I’m using a lot of caps lock. Sorry. More Brienne, please!
Belfast and Tourism Northern Ireland are expecting an extra 833,000 people will visit Northern Ireland by 2015, which they say will bring an added help to our recovery in the economic down turn.
“Little girl dead, smashed in the head, rings of pale hair, face so fair, covered in blood—what a pretty picture she makes.”
The church is called to fruit by remaining connected to the life giving/love flowing sap of the Shepherd-Vine.
"Take a look at this, Pev." Dagdan had walked a little way up towards the crest of the hill, studying the grass.
unbidden, uninvited..........
I pinched my fingers only once. I was working hard and sweating so much by the time I had broken it open, I had muddy sweat running into my eyes.
and last but definitely not least, Clive Barker—for Weaveworld, Everville, Imajica, and the Books of Blood
I don’t know what your up to when you go play with your sister and her room is completely destroyed afterwards! Your great at blaming Chloe for the mess, but I know you’re the one moving all the toys even if I’m finding her in the toy box!
If you don't want to wait for weeks, Kari also shared in this post how to make instant vanilla sugar. I made it and it's wonderful, but I didn't use it in the pudding because I already had vanilla sugar made up. I don't see why it wouldn't work in the pudding recipe, though.
- The cat stretched out in a patch of sunlight on the couch, watching television with me.
In reality our cottage sits in the centre of a small hamlet, but in my head I live joyfully surrounded only by nature.
Following last month’s announcement of Pokémon Conquest, Nintendo has revealed even more details about the new features available in the game, which launches for the Nintendo DS family of systems on June 18. Players can look forward to exploring the Ransei region and interacting with Pokémon in an entirely new way as they take on the role of a young Warlord who is linked with a Pokémon. Together they must set out to recruit Warrior allies to strengthen their growing kingdom. Developed by TECMO KOEI GAMES Co., Ltd., the game can also be played on the Nintendo 3DS system in 2D mode.
10:00 – Moby (DJ Set), Neon Indian (DJ Set) @ Webster Hall $1 (19+)
Of course, while Emily and her mother were gone, Rowan and daddy would hang the Christmas lights and decorate the outside of the house in preparation for Christmas.
The public had to find out that on at least 4 occasions the Cabinet approved travel funding to the tune of hundreds of thousands of dollars for your sister!
Plants are not going to sit idly by with their roots stuck in the mud, letting life-forms with brains have all the fun. “Radical changes in the Aster family” have been reported ! No sarcasm here, I actually do care. I like daisies. Am I still going to be able to buy daisies ?
5. More travel -- self-funded when possible -- to the places where classic beer styles are made, to Ireland for a whiskey trip, some days before or after Chicago WhiskyFest to visit breweries in the Midwest.
The manner of my death will likely be heavily sedated, but peaceful and painless.
4) Does Suburbia Hurt Christianity? Community is spread out. It occurs irregularly at appointed places such as schools, churches and athletic facilities that are miles apart. It offers little in the way of unifying cultural and civic institutions because there is no commitment to a place … because there is no “place.”
Dear Hannah,
# Puke it all out and then cleaning it.
“All through the night, there was shooting. The gunfire didn’t stop,” a resident of the city told The Associated Press by phone Wednesday. “I can’t tell exactly what is going on because it’s dangerous to go out.”
Army Cpl. Patrick R. Glennon of Rochester, N.Y., will be buried April 11, at Arlington National Cemetery. On Nov. 1, 1950, Glennon, and the G Company, 8th Cavalry Regiment, 1st Cavalry Division, were holding a defensive position along the Nammyon River near Unsan, North Korea, when they were attacked by Chinese forces. Glennon was listed as missing in action following the heavy fighting. In April 2007, the Democratic People's Republic of Korea (DPRK) handed over six boxes of remains of American service members to New Mexico Governor Bill Richardson and former U.S. Secretary of Veterans Affairs Anthony Principi, who were visiting North Korea. The remains had been recovered from areas near Unsan, where Glennon had been lost. Metal identification tags bearing Glennon's name, and other material evidence were included with the remains. To identify the remains, scientists from the Joint POW/MIA Accounting Command and the Armed Forces DNA Identification Laboratory used circumstantial evidence and forensic identification tools such as dental records and mitochondrial DNA -- which matched Glennon's cousins.
Amos 2:4-5… God roars against Judah… “because they have despised the law of the Lord and did not keep his commandments” (KJV)… and their “lie-living” angered the Lord. This sin is as bad as any other sin. All people, including Christians, are accountable to God. Christians may not do some of the things that God has judged the heathen nations for… but, God calls it a transgression when Christians fail to keep His Word. Many Christians today have a desire to know the Word, but not to obey the Word. God judged Judah for not obeying… they rebelled against obeying… Note… v. 4… their lies caused them to err… Did they compromise the truth? Did they feel that because they were “Judah,” they could lower God’s standards? Note… they followed their fathers into error rather than following the word of God. Many today listen to preachers with a magnetic personality who are birthing error, and people are following them into error. Errors that are preached long enough begin to seem like the truth. One such error is embodied in the doctrine of the “rapture.” The doctrine of the rapture was not at all common in Christian belief until the early 1800s, when Edward Irving and John Nelson Darby developed and popularized the concept of a pre-tribulation “rapture.” Up until that time the church preached that, in the end times, the church would experience tribulation… Millions of saints will fall away when tribulation comes because they have been geared towards escapism and not towards going through the difficulties of end-times pressures. The first six roars in the book of Amos brought judgment because of man’s injustices to man… but here… Judgment came to Judah because of their injustices to God.
But this is different.
In 2011: 22nd National Poetry Slam in Cambridge and Boston, Mass.:
If you are honest and sincere people may deceive you. Be honest and sincere anyway.
The premiere took place on 2 April 1800 at the K.K. Hoftheater nächst der Burg in Vienna.
Purchase $75.00 of products from this catalog to qualify to purchase
naked trees
I was shocked and appalled to read a Catholic clergyman extol the virtues of censorship on his blog. Having heard a rumour in his local pub that the BNP's Chairman, Nick Griffin, was to appear on the BBC's Question Time, Fr Peter Weatherby wrote the following:
Augustine was no one we knew or heard of. I knew nothing of church fathers. The Bible was all we had to go by. So when Jesus told Peter that he gave him the keys to the kingdom we understood it to mean that Peter had the keys to the kingdom of God.
I hope you don't think I'm weird or "out there". This is just my way of getting in my Father's presence and worshiping the One who holds me on His lap.
Those who know me will understand what this blog post is about, but even if you dont know me its still worth reading and remembering how our actions affect others within our industry:
For the other side I needed extra thickness at the top for the brackets to attach to so I put
I have a constant craving for Mumbai street food and some of these dishes have become my party staples! One such recipe that I find myself repeating very often whenever I have guests or my family wants to eat something different is Pav Bhaji. I never fail to get rave reviews and never have seconds left! Recently, when a friend of mine e-mailed me for my Pav Bhaji recipe - I realised I don't have one posted on my blog. So this one is for her...
I do not see the road ahead of me...
My Rating 6/10
His incredible talk ended with so many hands bristling with energetic questions for the author he could have been there all day.
Recorded in Rome 1975, July 28
I have been seeing my blind date quite a bit. Been on five dates with him so far, and I am really enjoying my time with him. Unfortunately, I am also very insecure about us. Mostly because I think I am “missing” being in a relationship. The consistency of having someone by my side, to cuddle with, laugh with, cry with, etc. I recognize that this is a SAM issue. Strictly mine. My expectations around dating needs to change. Shift. I no longer want a relationship I just “dive into.” That being said, I would think after five dates, and one sleep over (sans sex), that I would hear from him more frequently than I am, but perhaps this is just the pace he likes to progress with. Maybe not. Either way, the purpose of dating is supposed to be trying to see if we are compatible. So we shall see how this goes. But for now, his nick name for the purposes of this blog is SMARTY. Short for Smarty Pants.
Poor credit payday Loans deliver capital that tumble in the modest range of £80 to £1500 based on the applicant’s economic steadiness and pay out ability. You must pay the money back in the cozy settlement tenure of 1 to 30 days. As soon as you obtain these funds, you can apply amount of items. it is possible to decide the money you owe if you are paying for these people, can fulfill health and academic expenses, will probably pay another awaiting expenses, installments and so forth.
I'm a "we."
My mother, sister and I needed to laugh and so decided that going to see 21 Jump St. might help us achieve that goal. It did. We laughed, gasped, I dry-wretched every time there was a vomit joke and at one point assumed the foetal position to prevent projectile vomiting on the people in front of me, and mostly we had a great time.
After having a breast reduction in February of 2000, I quit smoking again. I was doing some working out and eating better at first. I think I got down again to about 145 pounds, if I recall correctly. The man that is now my husband and I started dating that summer. My confidence and energy levels were through the roof and I felt wonderful.
My grandmother is very spiritual. Ironically, not too long before her stroke, we were having a deep conversation about life and death. She had explicitly expressed how she’d rather live a short, well-lived life than live for a long time, debilitated with sickness. Quality has always been more important to her than quantity. Living in a nursing home, dependent on others would be absolute hell for her.
“Director Lorovic, this is Senator Drahzen,” said the voice on the other end of the line. Lorovic rolled his eyes. Politics again.
Next came the legislators. They had big smiles! Many of them said they personally “got it” and put the blame on Governor Bentley for his signed no new tax pledge, a bizarre Medes and Persians type oath that apparently means more than his oath of office to do his best for our state. Senator Orr said the idea of having to override Bentley’s promised veto for a tax increase “gives us heartburn.” But the way they were smiling, I have my doubts about the “got it” part. I sure didn’t see anything that made me want to dig in my purse for an antacid to share.
I kind of have too much energy, hence these numerous blogposts
What makes a movie suck? Bad writing, bad acting, bad directing, bad story? The list is long and sometimes it is difficult to put your finger on the exact cause. Since there was nothing on TV last night I decided to watch an old B movie called Desperate Hours.
Now that I have planned out my shadows, I can layer my limited colors. Since I like drawing people, I have a good range of skin tones. I start by adding E000 over all skin areas, including the gray colored parts. then, over the gray shadows, I added E11 and E04. See how much lighter the gray is now?
So the flu would not just be killing fat people, but poor and uneducated people – “dumb people.”
I began putting song format in the upper left hand corner of the first page so that musicians could tell at a glance what order the verses, choruses, and bridges came in the song.
A true Londoner is obsessed with the weather and the weather as a topic for discussion is unavoidable. When a beautiful sunny and cloudless day arrives (remember, this is not that often) a Londoner will appreciate the warmth on his back more than most. On a miserable, grey and rainy day he will probably complain considerably more than most. For the Londoner, the 'grey' and the 'drizzle' has come to represent all that is wrong with the city. Paris enjoys a very similar climate to London yet weather never seems to predominate the Parisians thoughts. Mention London and 'dismal weather' is the first thing to mind. Mention Paris and 'glorious, magnificent and romantic' are the associations first up. I don't mind the English weather, probably because I have basked in many sunny days; perversely, I find the rainy, dull days rather comforting. One thing is for sure...I can now talk 'weather' with the best of them, especially the London taxi drivers.
Founders Dirty Bastard … Michigan; 8.5% … 3.75
Jackie - Ivory Size 6
Dear Ainsley
This is the HIGHER LAW
I'm not sure. You mean, lay the
Jack also edited the first video for the “Mighty Mighty Bosstones,” whose lead singer Dicky Barrett, is also from Norwood. Barrett is now the announcer for the Jimmy Kimmel Show and we were on the same Pop Warner team a zillion years ago. Seems I’m always finding some Norwood connection to everything. It amuses my wife, whose Detroit suburb where she grew up is not nearly as ubiquitous as Norwood.
B+
So -- yes, you can learn to spin with a second-hand wheel with only one bobbin. Despite my love of tools, tools, tools, we can usually find basic substitutes around the house, or do the same task with a body part (the leg-niddy) or just a bit slower (hand-winding balls versus the ubiquitous Royal ball winder).
“Here,” he said as he tossed the bone to Angelo, “now skee-daddle!”
Cook bacon in skillet until crisp; set aside and crumble. Do not drain pan.
Isn’t always “me first,”
to be in Paris,
Another dance in the rain
Friday: Organizing and Rearranging
Here's to the end of a very stressful term! Goodbye winter term! I can't say it was much fun, but I did learn some things. Hello spring term, lets have some FUN!
I didn’t do a real good job this year of coming up with worthy New Year’s resolutions. In the past, I’ve promised myself I’d lose weight or be more thrifty, and generally did a good job of follow-through all the way into February. I’ve put the ambitious agendas aside this year, and decided instead to work on smaller, more achievable goals.
Once Dave did an event a Celebrity Centre. He was sweating like a pig – it was an outdoor event in LA in August, so not too surprising. He hired an outside video special effects firm to erase the sweat sheen, frame by frame, at a cost of $150,000. Oh, and of course his make-up person (a Sea Org member paid 40 cents an hour) was RPFed for “sabotage.”
The husband of the antiquities dealer is a hotshot share trader who, along with his buddies, hatches a get rich quick scheme. It involves illegally diverting gas down a disused pipeline and selling it during their artificially created gas price spike.
The happiest hula-hooping hippie-esque Liberty Tax employee, that's what. She's out there for hours, waving and hooping and generally making my day when I pass by.
The lawsuit describes the alleged chronology of events: Willis explained the administrators’ suspicions by saying "you people don’t score that high." Although no other evidence of cheating was produced, the administrators demanded the women return their test scores and re-take the two-hour test. Jackson-Burch refused and got in her car but Johnson used her body to block the car from leaving. The administrators called 911.
I just noticed Blogger's new layout, blah I dislike it so much... It always take ages from me to adapt to changes. :P But hopefully this will be the end of annoying blogger-fails, I just have to learn how to use this... What do you guys think?
At the Four Hands showroom I spotted this colorful chair in tones of gray, blue, orange, and yellow. The classic shape becomes modern when upholstered in an unconventional pattern.
It tires me out just thinking about it all, especially when I’m in the middle of it. Just because I need it, and I bet I have a lot of friends who could use it right about now, let’s recap what moms do.
-Heat the same oil used for frying and saute onions till brown in color.
I have a new niece, and see my nephew growing up (and my little brother growing into his role as Dad). One member of my animal family is getting older, while the other still revels in his youth. And my partner is strong at my side, blessing me with his presence every day.
If this book were a movie it would likely be rated R for language, gore, sexuality, violence, and adult situations
“Even though Ferne was fat, I always thought of her as petite, small hands and feet, bangles from her fingers to her elbows, soft skirts layered in flowered cottons with lace bodices, Egyptian and Moroccon clothes. She was a munchkin type, really quite cute. She had spent a year, you know, teaching in Ethopia, at the Haile Selassie School.
I got an exciting email last night from a friend I've blogged about before who is am AMAZING textile artist. It opens up several avenues of fun and as a hint as to what one of them is I leave you with this video she has made. It is only a minute long and very beautiful.
I guess with the “drastic cold” in the area any and everything and everyone is getting sick-ish of some sort. I am trying to beat it out so far I am hanging in there but we shall see what this week brings. Hopefully more time and not so much school work. I can dream right?
Have a fabulous Thursday everyone -- I'll be back with more fun tomorrow so be sure to check back in! :-)
I'm so excited to welcome the wonderful Marie Treanor to The Enchanted Book today. I fell in love with her book, Blood on Silk--well, let's be honest, I fell in love with Saloman--and have loved her Awakened by Blood series. So without any more from me, here's Marie herself.
The Dicks fist LP "Kill From The Heart" released in 1983 was a classic Austin, Texas commie faggot punk rock document of their lives. Living, objecting and revolting the lands cowboy stance. Burly punk drenched blues, anthems and raucous noise, they became local legends along with the Big Boys. The crudest panties with the shriveling Dicks.. Suck On.
Reflection: Do you know the peace and security of the Good Shepherd who watches over his own? The Old Testament often speaks of God as shepherd of his people, Israel. The Lord is my shepherd, I shall not want (Psalm 23:1). Give ear, O Shepherd of Israel, you who lead Joseph like a flock! (Psalm 80:1) We are his people, and the sheep of his pasture (Psalm 100:3). The Messiah is also pictured as the shepherd of God’s people: He will feed his flock like a shepherd, he will gather the lambs in his arms (Isaiah 40:11). Jesus says he is the Good Shepherd who will risk his life to seek out and save the stray sheep (Matthew 18:12, Luke 15:4). He is the Shepherd and Guardian of our souls (1 Peter 2:25).
Why We Write
Answer: Where are blacks more dehumanised than in black African states. There is no comparison between the dehumanisation of any blacks anywhere in Africa under black rule than ever was the case during Apartheid. I always find it interesting how the whole world would rise up against Apartheid, always refer to Apartheid and demonise Apartheid, yet no one ever says a word about Africa, the human rights violations in Africa during the past thousands of years. No one ever mentions the advantages of Apartheid, how it grew and develop South African blacks when compared against the rest of Africa during the same period. More black millionaires were produced under Apartheid than in all of Africa combined during the same period.
Zoo City bores far beneath the stale sewers of formula sci-fi and returns with a nugget so new you’re not sure if you should set it on the shelf to stare at or keep it in your undies to warm your cockles.
She stands “Cleo… My name is Cleo” she replies.
On Friday, April 27th, Bang Tao’s new Bliss Beach Club will be hosting its own special ‘Beach Ball’…island style. Kick off your shoes and dig your toes in the sand as the sun sets in support of the Phuket Has Been Good To Us Foundation.
Secular Islam results in purist Islamist revolutionaries either armed or not who reliably seek to overthrow the non-Islamic secular regime in favor of a more Islamic and purified one. This typical trend has been going on since the beginning of Islam and there doesn’t seem to be any reason to think it is slowing down or losing steam. Muslim countries are becoming increasingly Islamic, not more and more secular, in our modern era.
Not only will this be a great time to learn a lot about dealing with eating disorders, but it will be like a (dare I say it?)…VACATION! We’ll attend treatment from 9am-4pm, and then be free to do as we please.
I’m not even sure how Go, Dog. Go! found itself in my hands to read two weeks ago since I avoid those paper-paged books like vampires avoid sunlight and Luke avoids vegetables. But, none the less, I read it and realized it is a book about Luke’s favorite things – dogs and cars. Dogs in cars. Dog driving cars. Big dogs. Little dogs. Black and white dogs. It also contains the word “go” quite a bit – one of Luke’s favorites these days.
5 1/2 c. cinnamon toast crunch cereal
Not able to control emotions. This is a personal goal of mine. As I head into my mid-forties, I so long to be able to refrain from crying if I'm out in public and something moves me. So far, not much luck with that.
As all points merged into one single point in the yidam
Fellow psychologist Frederic Wertham missed the message too. He considered Wonder Woman “one of the most harmful” crime comics and the character “a horror type. She is physically very powerful, tortures men, has her own female following, is the cruel, ‘phallic’ woman. While she is a frightening figure for boys, she is an undesirable ideal for girls, being the exact opposite of what girls are supposed to want to be.”
So, I knew the month was going to be hectic. I planned ahead the best I could. Transportation and lodging were all worked out in advance for the three weekend visits. In my mind, at least, I had the itinerary and menu laid out for my son’s graduation. But, 8 days before his graduation, my son passed-out briefly and fell and cut open his chin. I was right there in front of him and didn’t realize what had happened, especially when he got right up and seemed ok. So, this is disaster number one, or soon became one. I could write a long explanation of what transpired over the next 50 hours before we were able to get him out of the hospital where I had taken him for stitches (and I think I will write it…to the hospital by way of explaining the root causes for the high cost of medical care in this country). I’ll just cut to the chase and say that we got him out around 10 p.m. that Wednesday and he took make-up finals Thursday and Friday and did graduate on the appointed day. I am sure to find out exactly how much my insurance policy states for max out-of-pocket very soon…all for five stitches. Probably about 2 grand per stitch.
Presumably they continue their sacrament-fueled partying the trio famously did in Berlin earlier this year and commemorated with a full page ARTFORUM ad. As for Linzy there is no speculation as to why it happened. He is still scheduled to speak at the The School of The Art Insitute on March 28. Earlier this spring it was heard that Linzy had been searching for a venue in Chicago, did one deemed "better" or more "high-profile" pop up? It's anyone's guess as to why and how this went down.
There’s getting to be more distance between towns as I head West. It’s important to stop for water at every gas station, even if you aren’t out, and to get out early, giving yourself more leeway before dark.
soaking up sun / beating friends at cribbage.
5. Veda is not anybody’s creation, it is its own voice, its own memory. This is that light of God, not created by anyone.
Alright my dears! Pray for us tomorrow! Not shooting for any specific time, just for a sweet finale with the family. Enjoy your weekend. And my goodness don't forget about the giveaway!
Two of far nobler shape, erect and tall,
One of the reasons Monsanto According to Monsanto started was because there were so many inconsistencies and, in my opinion, outright libelous things being said about Monsanto, particularly in the blogosphere. What better way to address what is being said then to respond using the same medium?
Yes, it was all those things but it was more significant than that. Thanks to the ease and speed of digital - and undeniably the particular advantages it offers, while analogue has other advantages - the industry for analogue film is dying. The big, commercial studios are convinced that the future is digital, and without their money flowing in, the facilities to deal with film from shooting to projecting are shutting up shop. Kodak have filed for protection against their creditors, and something like twenty-eight out of the thirty film processing companies in London have closed down in the last two years. And because there's no one to handle your film, film itself is going the way of... well, can you think of any other creative medium that has ever just ceased to be available? Evolved, shrunk, got more expensive, fallen out of favour, yes. But just, plain, vanished? So there's a campaign, of which Dean and the likes of Martin Scorsese are only the most visible parts, to get photographic film named a UNESCO World Heritage... um, Thing. That would open the door to all sorts of help and funding for those who want or need to use and support it, just as in our own industry National Short Story Week is the umbrella under which all sorts of good initiatives can then huddle, confer, publicise themselves, and make grant applications.
The ethics of Islam bridge the realms of Faith and World — what we call Din and Dunya. Accordingly, my institutional responsibilities for interpreting the faith are accompanied by a strong engagement in issues relating to the quality of life, not only for the Ismaili community but also for those with whom they share their lives — locally, nationally and internationally. This principle of universality is expressed uniquely in the Holy Quran where it is written, “O Mankind, be careful of your duty to your Lord who created you from a single soul … (and) joined your hearts in love so that by His grace ye became brethren.”
“I needed to show my own vocal color. To be honest, I have a lot of friends who are good at singing. To be able to show my vocal abilities fully, I needed to practice our country’s ballads’ perfectly, and find a way to express the sensibility found in R&B and soul songs. The thing I was concerned the most about was the way to make my voice tone sound different than the other singers’.”
Jerk Seasoning:
Then came to the actual work. After working on the cosmetics of the trunk, we noticed that there was coolant leakage. We added more coolant to see what the problem might be. Well it turns out we found where the hose was that was cut to get the alternator out. It was the heater hose. Since the idea was to get the car running. The idea was to bypass the heater core. When I pulled part of the heater hose off that was attached to heater core, I realized that the attachment tube was crushed. That’s one more thing to do now.
Me and my friend Chris decided to run a marathon.
1/2 a tsp freshly ground Pepper
“The intuitive mind is a sacred gift and the rational mind is a faithful servant. We have created a society that honors the servant and has forgotten the gift. The most beautiful thing we can experience is the mysterious; It is the source of all true art and science.” ~ Albert Einstein
Peace out.
Color is one of life's luxuries!
middle of April!!
I opted to see it in 2-D (what can I say, I dig that retro feel… and fancied saving £1.50) but was still very impressed by the effects, which were flawless. And one particular scene, where an aircraft carrier turned into, well, something else, was outstanding. Even in an age where SFX are so widespread that half of Eastenders may soon be shot against a green screen, with Phil Mitchell’s face digitally projected onto a body double.
India’s rapeseed output is expected to fall 8.5 percent to 6.3 million tonnes in 2012 on lower acreage of the oilseed crop, a trade body survey showed on Monday. (mainly due to unfavourable weather at the beginning of the planting season.)
I would have liked to know more about the Vampire Council. Each member of the council is named after a Greek or Roman god. Like Jade, I wonder if that's because they are the gods of legend or if they're simply vampires who have chosen to fit themselves into those roles. I would have loved to know a bit more about their history and how they became vampires. Also, at the beginning of the book, Jupiter’s wife is referred to by the Roman name Juno, but at the end of the book, the Greek name Hera is used. This caused me a small moment of confusion, but didn’t interfere with my enjoyment of the story.
-Sanic
"But, why?"
As for blacks, they see no reason to welcome a population that takes their jobs for lower wages and competes with them for political favors from largely white politicians. “Why should we be in coalition with some group that wants to outnumber us?” asks Shannon Frank Reeves, head of the Oakland, Calif., NAACP.
For my wedding cake card I used some new stunning paper from Teresa Collins. I just picked this up last week and couldn't wait to use it! I like the blue and yellow color combo for a wedding...so summery! I simply stamped the lovely cake image on white cardstock and colored with Copics. The sentiment is stamped on a paper ribbon and I added a big 'ol frame of pearls to showcase that pretty dragonfly paper and image. I also added a little sparkle to each of the flowers with Stickles.
If your kid comes home from school talking about Screen Free Week remember that you don't have to be the school system's enforcer. You can talk with your child about why they want to participate, you can agree to support them in giving it a try and if they change their mind half way through you can acknowledge that choice without heaping on the shame or guilt. You can also respect each person in the family's right to make their own decision about participating, or not.
Though I was not a beneficiary of PTPTN, I routinely meet young people who are, through the education sub-committee of Yayasan Munarah, the royal foundation funded solely by private and corporate donations.
to make up for it, i celebrated his birthday for the rest of the trip, telling him happy birthday each day and letting him choose things "just because it was his birthday"!
Okay, i’m sorry, i’m gonna have to change the title of this post; this weapon is overpowered. No, really. Even talking about this weapon makes me see red, so i’m keeping this brief:
Buttons are blue
C'est que ça pèle
Crystal Light Candy .75/2 - expires 2/28/2011
Recently I’ve asked a couple of you to remove spoilers from your reviews, and you kindly and graciously agreed, and for that, I thank you. Others of you refused to change a word, saying you stand by what you said. I did not ask you to change your opinion. I merely asked you to remove the spoilers, which did not merit the abusive reply.
6:27 - Chuck Goldstone
I would venture to guess that Ann Romney does not know what a gallon of gas is running – nor does she probably know what a pound of beef costs.
and a play date with friends.
Nicole: you know what
* Visited the sitter for 2 days!
“Listen Sally,” Peter said standing up from his bed, “I understand how you feel about me being away but it’s funny how you seem to really enjoy the fat bonus checks I bring back home after these trips. If you do have a problem with this arrangement you can always be replaced, I’ve done it before.”
And so it is that she discovers Nell Shoemaker, a 13-year old urchin girl who has an uncanny connection with the natural world. To Nell the sorceress gives the gift of the Wealding Word; but there is no time to explain how to use it. Left to discover the wonders of the Word on her own, Nell quickly finds her world transformed into a fairy tale where she can speak with animals and bewitch plants.
♥The mystery of where she is continues and we are wondering, if that is a window to her world. I think you could give the bars a hint of being a window with a dark line at the bottom of the bar where it connects to the horizontal bar. And then a miter/diagonal line at the corner. That would be enough but if you wanted to carry it a little further, load your brush with a very very light load of paynes gray and run a very tiny stripe of it on the left side of each bar and along the inside bottom bar. It will add a little depth to the flat bars.
What I’ve been given.
We've had an old friend staying this week and there has been lots of walking, even some cycling, much talking, giant eating, a bit of music, some dressing up. I still managed to get to art class on Wednesday though and this time I asked Jackie (teacher) if I could try pastels (chalky ones... I had a go with oil ones a couple of weeks ago – the thistles back here). I really only intend to do the ten classes right now so I'd like to try as many different ways of making marks as I can while I'm there (next stop watercolours!). Maybe it seems odd to only want the ten classes at this point... but I am odd... and who knows... I may have some other classes in the future.
Quin - Clean up the kitchen
With a baby or toddler, your hands are always full. The reusable Nursery® bag, with storage pouch, is perfect for carrying diapers and wipes, extra clothes or groceries. And, best of all, it is FREE!
No more war pigs have the power
I am staying really busy... this week Denver, Co. Next weekend New Jersey!
These yummy little cookies taste like chocolaty brownies packed with tart cranberries and crunchy walnuts. Chocolate Cranberry Nut Cookies are as quick and easy to make as other drop style cookies and are free of processed sugar.
“They’re not kids, Julian. . .they’re tweens, remember?” I corrected. “And this house is built like Fort Knox!”
So....what did I do with my newly found time on my hands? I drank a cup of coffee and read a book....uninterrupted...in complete silence.....it was heaven. I am so happy for Asha because I know that she will thrive in her new school. She will make new friends and learn new stuff....like.... how to sit quietly for more than 3 seconds at a time. Love you Asha!
You will be happy and it will be well with you.
The nice thing about this movie is that while the plot is fairly simple; it explores very realistic emotions that we all feel within ourselves about our place in the world, as well as our place in our relationships. There were moments in the movie when I was frustrated that the Wilson's character did not realize certain things that were happening, because I could imagine myself in the very same situation, and HAVE realized what was happening, and therefore been very upset. But it also delves into the surrealistic world of anachronism and nostalgia, and let's not only the main character, but other characters in the film as well, explore their world beyond the scope of their place and time. This makes the movie fun and quirky, but in the end also let's us in on the point of the entire film.
Unless, y’know, you’re throwing out almost all of physics again. That site describes the problem of how do it “economically”, and says that by traditional methods the car “could not recharge from the process quickly enough”, but makes it sound like levels of energy input and output are two separate issues to be improved upon. They don’t seem to mention the thing about needing more than 100% efficiency, which makes recharging from the process “quickly enough” about as likely as being able to run fast enough to overtake your own knees.
We’re about to get a really big reminder of how the constant change and progress or a free society overturns the static calculations of government bureaucrats. The US Postal Service is bankrupt. At its current rate, it will have to shut down this winter because it will run out of cash to pay its bills. This has been coming for a long time, and not just because of a bloated union payroll. First-class mail is the core business of the Postal Service, and the Internet has simply made it unnecessary. From everyday communications to bills and bank statements, practically everything can now be done by e-mail or online. Even our junk mail is digital now. So while President Obama is talking about a jobs bill, an obsolete government-run entity is about to lay off hundreds of thousands of superfluous workers.
AUDIO QUALITY: A+
At the same time, some experts said Iran was not likely to deploy such a sophisticated weapon without also sending Revolutionary Guard crews with the expertise to fire the missile.
Whether you are a blogger looking for more visibility or an author struggling to find and gain an audience, one thing is for sure – leveraging social media can be one key to success. But should you use twitter, facebook, myspace, linkedin, google+, live journal, goodreads, wordpress, ning, meetup, mylife…? And what does SEO mean – argh! Endless opportunities, endless options, unfortunately, none of us has endless time.
Time is life and one can literally commit slow suicide by killing time. It is important to have proper priorities and to preoccupy ourselves with doing good for others instead of thinking only of ourselves. We should ask ourselves, “Are we giving our children a feeling of being loved and appreciated?”
As the elderly witnesses gradually die off and it becomes less common to see people with numbers tattooed on their arms and a certain look in their eyes, remembrance is at a premium.
Popular young politician Nicole Seah has demanded for accountability from bus companies SBS Transit and SMRT following two horrific road traffic accidents involving their drivers.
And all who get too close are sorry
Therefore I say unto you, Take no thought for your life, what ye shall eat, or what ye shall drink; nor yet for your body, what ye shall put on. Is not the life more than meat, and the body than raiment? Behold the fowls of the air: for they sow not, neither do they reap, nor gather into barns; yet your heavenly Father feedeth them. Are ye not much better than they? Which of you by taking thought can add one cubit unto his stature? And why take ye thought for raiment? Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow; they toil not, neither do they spin: And yet I say unto you, That even Solomon in all his glory was not arrayed like one of these. Wherefore, if God so clothe the grass of the field, which today is, and tomorrow is cast into the oven, shall he not much more clothe you, O ye of little faith? Therefore take no thought, saying, What shall we eat? or, What shall we drink? or, Wherewithal shall we be clothed? (For after all these things do the Gentiles seek:) for your heavenly Father knoweth that ye have need of all these things. But seek ye first the kingdom of God, and his righteousness; and all these things shall be added unto you.Take therefore no thought for the morrow: for the morrow shall take thought for the things of itself. Sufficient unto the day is the evil thereof. Mat 6:25-34
Love, sweetness, goodness, in her person shin’d
These judgements, whether rude or neutral, newly acquired or long indulged, are pet peeves. They have nothing to do with grammatical correctness. Any suggestion that different than/to is grammatically incorrect, end of story, would have dissolved in a few minutes’ research or by consulting a single reliable authority.
I understand it's difficult to imagine what it looks like when you allow children this kind of control over their own lives. We grow up being told that children are incapable of making good decisions. It's hard to let that idea go. I was doubtful about it when I first read the suggestion, not long ago. But as we read more about radical unschooling, my husband and I decided we could and wanted to trust our children.
A double minded man is uncertain which way to go. He is confused.
The Lost Art of Keeping Secrets (Eva Rice)
I offer the following suggestions:
While sitting in a very comfortable Deutsch Bahn express bus from Prague to Nuremburg, some cycling infrastructure was seen in the suburban parts of the city. It did not seem well connected from a network perspective. Bike signs were visible along the way.
Not buying this one at all.
Cllr Rodney Law
Slightly disappointed, we decide we will not let this dampen our spirit and that we are going to 'discover' Fuengirola. Get to know it, our way around…
If you have a gas stove, turn one of the burners to high, and, one at a time, char the poblanos on all sides. Use tongs to turn them to keep your hands safe and really let them blacken on each side. (If you don't have a gas stove, you can do this under your broiler too - just put the poblanos on a baking sheet and turn with tongs when blackened.)
As you might already know by now, there’s no escaping the neon color trend this summer!
It has very less running cost. Since there is less moving parts it has less maintenance cost. A lot of advantages are there for electric vehicles.
This narrative is a product of the Pakistani military establishment’s ‘strategic depth’ policy, and was propagated internationally by former military dictator Pervez Musharraf. Addressing the European Union parliament in September 2006, he said the Taliban represent Pashtuns and they could spark a ‘national war’ in Afghanistan. Domestically, opinion makers say that the Afghan Taliban are representatives of the Pashtun.
I think about weaning. A LOT. I had a goal setting out to get to 18 months but that I wanted to wean by 2. What?! That's right, this is the TGL blogger who is NOT on the Child Led Weaning bus. I support Child Led Weaning, but it's really just not for me. I will probably talk more about weaning and what I'm learning in the coming months. I want to support those of our readers who are not on the Child Led Weaning bandwagon. Chase will probably nurse to 2. He's that guy for sure. But i'm not that mom, unfortunately for him. At some point I will wean him, probably *around* age 2.
Sacramento Bee
“We all want to know what happened and what motivated the suspect, but I think we need to be very, very careful here in these early days and let the investigation take its course,” Casey told me on ‘This Week.’
I’d like to start off by defining what I mean when I say Scatterbrain. The free dictionary.com defines a Scatterbrain in the following way:
"No woman's worth a bullet between the eyes, am I right or wrong?" - George (Joe Mategna)
So just keep rearranging those sentences anyway you want, and keep repeating them until drunkenness kicks in, and by then you are allowed to go a bit gay anyway because you normally end up slurring: You know what mate? (hic) I bloody loves you.
He watched her walk away with an apologetic smile. she was not repulsed by the scar that ran from his lift eyebrow, curved away from his cheek and jagged back to his chin? she wasn’t afraid?
So, just in case I don’t see ya…
Elvis even covered Aussie hitmaker Olivia Newton-John’s country hits “If You Love Me Let me Know” and others when the country music industry was creating an American country music awards show just to prevent non-Americans from country stardom, as if you can’t sing country if you weren’t born to it.
I drive past this area every week several times even though I live in another city.
* 3 tbsp shredded cheddar cheese, divided (I used mozzarella)
I'll know where to go. The prices are very reasonable, and Crystal can tell you the source of each and every ingredient.
With your back to the Zuid station you will see the enormous Justitie Paleis on the top of the hill and below it one of the best areas for lambiek in the capital- the genuine De Marollen (Marolles) district. Ploegmans and Het Warm Water- the latter with home-made faro based on Girardin lambiek- are places to seek out.
Me: I have marbles inside of me son.
There is a specific order to the readings done at Mass. The people sit and the Lector stands at the ambo and reads the first reading from the Lectionary. The Lector can either be a man or woman. Sometimes teens are Lectors. The first reading is from the Old Testament (except during the Easter Season) which was written before Jesus was born and relates to the Gospel Reading of the day.
Beyond what can be valued, rich or rare;
B. Big Person
Today:
abysmally low here and our soldiers
“A baby is an inestimable blessing and bother.”
And, just as a side note, I have over 50 followers now! Yay! I feel like Sheldon on the Big Bang Theory where he was more excited that he had 100 followers on twitter than that his girlfriend got an article on the cover of an important magazine. Thank you guys so much for being a part of this
The first stinging blow from the crop made her jump and gasp. “Squeal, pig.” He said loudly as he covered her shoulders, back, ass and thighs with swat after swat. Her high pitched squeals were rich in surprise and pain. He kept swinging as she crawled around and around him until she was panting and grunting and snorting between squeals. She fell to the floor twisting and turning under his blows. The crop lands mercilessly wherever skin is exposed, breasts, stomach legs and hips, back and thighs, feet and ass as she rolled and thrashed on the floor.
This should give you vertigo. You are peering into a carbon-free abyss. If we stopped burning carbon now, you and I, as Rapley points out, would starve to death in a week. Burnt carbon is our money, our lifestyle, our sense of who we are. The revolution is just too big to contemplate.
White Daisy embroidery floss
2. God Knows I Love You
Once it's done, I'll prop it up somewhere and gaze at it for a ridiculously long time. Then I'll go have a cup of coffee or something, and come back and gaze some more. I begin to see patterns I hadn't intended. I tell myself a story about it, interpret it. In the past few years I have more consciously created collages as a sort of prophecy, a picture of my intentions. It's rather like spellcasting, really; or prayer. And then the finished collage becomes an ongoing meditation as well as a way of tracking my progress. There is a poetry and fluidity and mystery to a collage that opens me into deep self-discovery. The meaning sometimes seems to make itself. To make me.
I want to hear from you all -women and men…what do you think? Is it okay to date someone exclusively knowing that you don’t want to marry them or you’re not sure where you are with them, and, most important….keeping that knowledge from them?
It takes a lot for a business to "86" a customer. In today's economy, no one can really afford to pick and choose their customers. Customers keep the lights on and the paychecks coming each week. So when a customer gets 86ed from a restaurant/bar, its for good reason.
Maria ate. (below)
A bully is misusing his freedom of speech and is also hindering others from practicing their rights. He is not only misusing his own freedom but also restricting other people’s freedom.
Is that this life becomes all that you want it to
Unlike the situation in Japan, the U.S. and Europe, partial design is not protected in China. Both the applicant and the patent attorney are most concerned about or confused with the question of how to file a subsequent design application in China to enjoy priority and obtain a scope of protection as large as possible when the first foreign application is for partial design. This article makes a brief analysis and explanation over this issue, and I welcome your precious comments.
But then I accidentally saw Promises and Borders by Jenny of Elephantz. I didn't mean to, really I didn't. She does the most beautiful things and this was no exception...I was hooked. Okay, I decided, I could do one. No more than that though.
T.J. Is located at
The second day in Lerik we went strait up to Mistan. On the way from the village to the mountain ridge we had several Horned and Woodlarks, Stonechats, Rock Buntings and Ortolans. After reaching the rocks we saw four Crimson-winged Finches but could not find the Irania. Also the following groups didn't see them and there was only a single bird recorded this year.
out of thin air into her fingers
Reduce. Re-use. Recycle.
My kids would spend hours filling buckets with sand, shaping them to look like castles. They would build moats, walls, tunnels and all kinds of intricate things out of sand. When they were done, they looked great, and they were so proud, wanting to show everyone what they had built. The next day, when we would go to the same spot, everything was gone. There was not even a trace of all the hard work put in just the day before.
Don't they? Don't your children just make your heart light and your cheeks hurt from smiling? Mine does. Ah, the sweet voiced way he says "Hi Mommy" can make my fluttering heart practically fly out of my chest and hearing him sing Big Yellow Taxi (well to be fair, he only sings the oooooooooo bop bop bop part) in the car just makes my whole day.
The first session I attended was about blogging basics. Yes, I've been doing this for a while now, but I have not jumped in and played around with the tools and widgets and all the fun things that are constantly coming into being. I found that I already knew most of what was discussed during that session but it was still a good place to start, and I did learn a couple new things and get some great resources for learning more. There were four presenters in this session but I only go one of their cards. Her name is Michelle Mitchell and her blog is called Scribbit; Motherhood in Alaska, and she knows a lot about using Blogger to create a successful blog.
Now, knowing absolutely nothing about how to go about creating a campaign setting come system (please feel free to offer advice) it is all getting done in a very round about way with no logical steps. The latest conversation I have had is about classes and dice systems.
From the station, which wins a prize for establishments with the most stereotypical outside-a-train-station names (see photo), we walked into town and found the mairie.
Patrick Joseph Driscoll, 70, Manalapan, N.J.
009.002 YUSUFALI: Go ye, then, for four months, backwards and forwards, (as ye will), throughout the land, but know ye that ye cannot frustrate Allah (by your falsehood) but that Allah will cover with shame those who reject Him.
As we watched a video of a life being formed from conception to birth and a testimony from a mom who chose life over abortion at our last MOPS meeting, tears were brought to many of the eyes in the room. Our speaker from Mid Cities Pregnancy Center gave us some astounding statistics. In 2008, 1 million teens were pregnant and 95% of those were unplanned. There were 80,000 abortions in Texas and in 2010 60% of abortions were women between the ages of 20-29. What struck me hard is that abortion is not just an issue for high school or college unwanted pregnancy. It is not just an issue of an unplanned baby between people who are not married. This issue affects everyone!
I’m freaking out — please don’t change this!
Sahu has even motivated her 22-year-old daughter to become an ANM. She is all set to fly back to her state where she is popularly known as “Udasi dai” and is seen carrying a cotton sling with medical kit over her shoulder.
one that has lost it's leaves for the winter, I nabbed a few off of my lilac bush. But if you had to,
This is a result of reality, ingrained into our genetics, despite our best efforts to scrub it out in recent years.
This is a layout i created with a postcard from my trip.
Once upon a time there was a bloke. He lived in a green and pleasant land and time marched on slowly as he found his way in the world. The bloke grew up and found a girl. They were soon married. Then they had a couple of kids. Suddenly life began to move at a faster pace. Work hours were longer and quality time shorter. Life’s little simple pleasures were fewer and more fleeting.
Neither mamma nor nurse need know!)
then disappeared for a day or two,
And as always when we're heading out of town, I go on a cleaning spree. My house is never as clean as when we're leaving. Which sucks, because we just destroy it with piles of dirty clothes and empty suitcases that sit out for a week once we get out, so we don't even get to enjoy it.
Notice why the wheels are turning
Those of us school reform nuts absolutely know that demographics does not equal destiny when it comes to student outcomes in a school. Amazing teachers (and especially multiple years of effective teachers) absolutely can change the trajectory of students coming from challenging circumstances. But sadly we also know that the most predictive data for a student’s outcomes are the demographics of their parents.
Anyhoo, I'm channel surfing last night, and I run across a video of his, and I nearly puked. He's gotten on the Kenny Chesney bandwagon (which in and of itself is pathetic enough) and done a song about Mexico, and the chorus is, "What happens in Mexico, stays in Mexico." Gee, Toby. THAT'S fucking original. Ugh.
As a Florida award recipient, Grossman is now eligible for consideration for the Ernst & Young Entrepreneur Of The Year 2011 National Award.
I love honour and respect the goddess
Roar boys, roar. It’s what Jesus would do.
I’m sure he will.Husbands are alike .Showing one’s appreciation and love boost their ego.It feels good to know they’re the hero in the life of their wives and that we don’t take them for granted .We think of them every single minute with every day breath.
Both Bjørn & I started new jobs... Him being home more often... me.. being gone more.
Ajit Jain
They're not talking to bitter or stout drinkers but to people who almost always drink lager. Lager has become commoditised, boring, indifferent an interchangeable. It has a loutish image. Kronenbourg is positioning itself as a more thoughtful, grown up brand. Its French heritage allows it to do this, because French cafe culture is slower and more laid back than British pub culture. How am I doing, BBH guys? I've almost convinced myself here.
This last Friday night we went to see Sheryl Crow, and Saturday night Allison Krauss and Union Station. They did not disappoint as some have done in the past! Sheryl Crow has a really nice personality onstage, very personable and enthusiastic. Allison Krauss has the voice of an angel, and is very softspoken, and Union Station had toes tapping. Both evenings followed outrageously hot and humid days, more typical of August than early June, but, thankfully, once the sun set it cooled down a smidgeon, with that light breeze off the river.
When the going gets tough
And I totally suck at it
The remaining items are a different matter in every respect. To begin with, they are by Bruckner. However, they are early rather than mature Bruckner, and in some cases very early Bruckner, sketched when the composer was in his mid-twenties. Of course it is always fascinating to encounter the apprentice compositions and other creative byways of great composers (has there been a greater symphonist than Bruckner?), and for that reason the music is worth hearing.
All Godin did was move an already established platform under his own control. There is nothing isolated in this empowerment. Paulo Coelho has been making several of his ebooks free to download, struck a deal last year with Amazon, exclusive of his publishers for ebook sale and distribution. The real proof to Ogorek’s assertion that the ‘Democratization of Publishing’ has occurred is when we see authors, week after week, month after month, year after year, self-publish successfully, having created their platform solely using those ‘three technologies’ and can compete with authors from mainstream publishers.
He explained how he had been ‘ripped off’ by an English couple out here, as well as the problems he has had with his in-laws and in-laws partners after a death in the family. Oh my God, aren’t some peoples lives complicated??
Herein lies the problems of digital distribution not just in gaming but across various mediums. Today they charge you for the ending of a game, tomorrow they’ll be charging you for the bullets in Modern Warfare 3.
“Life is about moving, it’s about change. And when things stop doing that, they’re dead.” Twyla Tharp
Slayer’s always been a bit of a mystery to me. Not the “why are they popular” part: there will always be ugly 15-year-old boys and money to be made catering to them being all evil and shit. I’m referring to the actual music. A friend burned me the Compact Disc. My good friend, Inter-Natalie. You should see her record collection. I like to listen to the hard-charging angry stuff when I am up in the gym working on my fitness, Sabbath and Titus Andronicus and the Boom Boom Satellites, so I tried a little Slayer and halfway through the third verse describing what can only be classified as “atrocities,” I quietly bowed out. I prefer to keep my tunes free of graphic descriptions of torture labs. Cartman was right: hippies hate Slayer.
2. Preheat oven to 350 degrees
I won’t ever hear you exhale as you disappear beneath my thrust,
2. Spend some time determining what really makes you unique. However, think about this not from your perspective, but from your clients’. Ask or survey them to find out what they believe makes you unique. It can be a very insightful exercise either positively or negatively.
Vegetable or Sunflower oil
I don’t charge $100 an hour for tours and, as my clients can attest, I offer step-down discounts after two and four hours. (Here are cost guidelines from the Guides Association of NYC, of which I’m a member.) Most of my tours last 2.5-3 hours. I’ve never done a tour longer than five hours or so--too tiring for me and for the client.
Take note that we are not going to talk about the reasons as to why people leave. Everybody already knows them. Only insensitive people deny or ignore the reasons because they simply don’t care. It’s even a cliché to elaborate them on this article as if it’s a new topic to discuss. What’s more important is that you know, acknowledge, appreciate and apply what must be done to make sure your company or department doesn’t suffer from “intellectuals’ loss” that could take its toll on its reputation, performance, and profits.
Its simple shape and craftmanlike composition take us instantly to the time of honest endeavour and personal improvement out of which the library itself was born.
“We must rouse in our people the unanimous wish for power in this sense, together with the determination to sacrifice on the altar of patriotism, not only life and property, but also private views and preferences in the interests of the common welfare.”
Educational Qualification: BE / B.Tech / ME / MTech / MS / MCA / MCS / MSc (Computer Science)
I nod my head as I really have no idea at all.
Lempel-Ziv complexity
(7) One of the happiest consequences of these discoveries has been the coming to light of a great quantity of Greek writing on scraps of papyrus (or on pieces of pottery) by I people of little education, and we are thus able to see the sort of Greek spoken by the common people of New Testament times – at any rate in Egypt.
As we continued our eastward journey in history from China, we arrived at two countries that were heavily influenced by the Chinese: Japan and Korea. Although I had previously noticed some similarities among the three cultures, I did not know why it was so until I learnt from our world history leson that Korea was once ruled by China, while Japan had sent its citizens to be educated in ancient China.
All I can remeber for now.
Shadow of Afghanistan: 1959-2012 is a compilation of over 100 hours of video shots by two Oscar-nominated filmmakers Jim Burroughs and Suzanne Bauman, who made 18 trips to Afghanistan over the last 26 years of war and chaos. The film is now released with publication of Blood on the Lens: A Filmaker’s Quest for Truth in Afghanistan, which describes the making of the documentary over the course of two decades, during which two crew members Lee Shapiro and James Lindelof were killed by Soviet troops when they were caught in a firefight with Mujahideen.
The pacing of the novel is perfect, it was a very quick read, and I loathed putting it down. It had enough detail to keep the reader interested and involved, yet this didn’t hamper the momentum of the novel. It kept me turning pages all the way through.
5. Martha Jeans (Top Shop)
JComm’s most recent project, the Blueprint, is meant as a tool for communities to develop similar committees in their region. We are working hard in New York City but there are dance communities around the country that would benefit from the collective power of a group like this. The Junior Committee hopes you will find a way to get involved and strengthen support for dance and the arts in America.
card Stock
People, the Occupy Movement is obviously growing into a bigger social revolution.
Happy Summer Saturday everyone. I hope you have a relaxing and fun weekend ahead of you.
It looks like we’re finally there. My mind drifts, making a list of things that must be accomplished that night.
If you have a traditionally published book and would like the conference bookseller, Aaron’s Books, to see if they can get it for the conference, please forward your information to Conference Coordinator Danielle at DRAY@BOOKREMARKS.NET.
It is now in your power to be serviceable to me, your Mother and yourself. I beg you will keep yourself at home or where your Mother sends you. Dont you come away till I send you word. When you bring anything to the ferry tell them its mine & mark it with my name.
I always have a hard time coloring these sweet little birds. The pictures on Google images are all so different. I chose a more peachy color scheme for the flowers and card with a little green for the bird. We don't get many Humming Birds here. They migrate in the late summer through the Eastern part of the state, so we get a few stragglers here in the middle.
We have two fabulous sponsors this fortnight.....
So, I’m up early for a Sunday, still very clear-headed and feeling a bit smug. I haven’t woken D1 but am about to. The phone rings – father-in-law calls from Australia.
Three years earlier, on a July 4th weekend, not far from where Harris killed Smith, Paul “Benny” Evangelista, known as a “Divine Prophet” was murdered along with his wife and four children. With an axe. Few axe murders are not gruesome, but this one was particularly so. The entire Evangelista family was hacked to pieces. The bodies in bedclothes. The divine prophet’s head was severed from his torso and placed on a chair in the family living room.
- 1 teaspoon vanilla extract or essence
Many people who lost their jobs in the 1930s still made their debt payments, as long as they had an incentive to do. Today homeowners with negative equity have little financial incentive to make their payments. By focusing so much on “affordability,” the Obama adminstration’s latest policies do little to prevent strategic default, and should not be expected to alleviate the foreclosure crisis.
The vaShawasha fought Chivawura’s army. When Chivawura saw that the vaShawasha were strong he told his army to run home. The vaShawasha followed but they did not catch Chivawura. They caught however two people (one was called Badze), but they (did not kill them, but told them to go back to their country.
John Bercow, Speaker of the House said “I am investigating one version of the events, put forward by an ex-Prime Minster, that Joyce - having had to remove his own hand with a chainsaw - found a rudimentary way of attaching said-chainsaw to his mishapen stump, thus allowing him to assault Andrew with a roaring, sawing blade of death, spilling his blood all over the floor.
Third, even as overwhelming evidence has emerged that through procedural fraud, the D.A. constructed a case out of whole cloth, Nifong’s enablers kept the faith.
The majority of people clustered toward the far fence, but there were enough people close by to make for some great photo ops. Especially as the competition time drew to a close and the winning hauls weighed, the entire event turned to fun. I remain astonished at the number of young men who will put a live parrotfish in their mouths for a photo op. Many people came up to me and inquired where I was from, welcoming me warmly when I answered. It was a very convivial atmosphere, with lots of laughter, smiles, and camaraderie.
respectivement.
Texas HB 1451 Rep. Thompson's Anti-Breeder Bill Filed Today!
( I found printible on the web)
A single woman should only marry a man she respects and trusts enough to follow.
The college unveiled the plan with some fanfare, garnering coverage in the NY Times as well as university print and electric trade publications.
4. give chocolate
Fluttering and dancing in the breeze.
Last night I went out for a drink with my long-lost cousin, and while I was gone Mike and the boys treated themselves to some ice cream.
(3) Here's a crazy one that I wasn't able to try out yet- use a small, dense paint roller! lol. Chill your cake and then take a paint roller to it. Apparently it works wonders! (You rock, Ellen!) I really want to attempt this but haven't had time to run out and get one. Apparently you can find them at Home Depot! Cool, eh? I'll let you guys know how it works out once I get a chance to try it!
As with Incognito, Jess Nevins provides the essay, this time looking at (as Brubaker put it) "the dark dark world of H.P. Lovecraft, godfather of pretty much all modern horror in one way or another."
Back to Peru. Most of my life I have wanted to see Machu Picchu. I saw a photo of it in my Spanish book when I was about fifteen. I think that explains why I have pored over materials about that particular site. Now that the trip is coming at me like a downhill snowball, I realize that MP is only a small part of the trip. It’s time for me to pay attention to Arequipa and Cuzco and the Colca Canyon. I’m starting to get excited now about the magnificent textiles I’ll see and buy there, as pictured in the top photo. Aren’t they gorgeous? A feast for the eyes. Heavenly to touch. I’ll have to make some tough decisions. I can’t buy all of them.
This excerpt of a poem called Charlotte at the Kings Staircase by Mercedes Kemp encapsulates the exhibition The Enchanted Palace now open at Kensington Palace in London. Not your run of the mill installation, this collaboration between fashion designers and artists including Vivienne Westwood, Stephen Jones, Boudicca, Echo Morgan, Aminaica Wilmont and William Tempest remakes Kensington Palace into a contemporary art gallery.
No, Impy, you piss off. And on the way, see if you can teach your son some respect for persons, property and pilsner. Actually, as he is the only one to have apologised and shown any shred of remorse in the week since it all happened, maybe you could have a chat with your son?
Best to be dumped by though, because they will leave and never come back. Won’t do better though, so you can laugh at his failure, even if it comes after a LONG ASS while. (Cesc Fabregas)
“There are so many soldiers with beards but I never saw any pictures of angels with beards.”
The aroma is real barley, with a very nice biscuity sweetness in the malt. The hop is ever-so-slight, and reminiscient of a pilsner. Again, even though this is a pale ale, you coulda fooled me. The smell is surprisingly solid.
A little bit crazy
This vicious cycle continues until her children are grown. And then the regret comes. The wishing for her children to grown faster has reversed. And now she wishes she could have it back. That she would have:
Norwich City - £45,603,067
You don't go too fast
from the surging and digging cadence of one
First time I've been up and down what should be an absolutely classic peak in Manitou Springs. Went with former CCXC teammate Martin Mudry.
Flies to the ball. Non-stop motor(becoming a theme with this year’s draft class). Good ball skills for linebacker. Good tackler – wraps up ball carrier.
I suggest we all start calling our local theaters to ask when they plan to show this movie, and make sure we attend one of its showings. It will be demonized by those who have a vested interest in the failure of the principles it contains, but you can be an individual and freely make up your own mind, after you see all three parts of the trilogy.
A single plump raindrop
He left me standing in front of a large window that looked out on an expanse of green. The beveled panes of glass somewhat obscured my view and mistook the large white beast charging toward the home as a horse. The large beast was let inside with dark black soil caked on his paws and came galloping toward me leaving paw prints on the white marble.
Phil smacked the spider with a book. When he removed the book the dazed spider put on a burst of speed, closing the distance to Elizabeth.
falling every night–
The present Conservative government plans drastic financial cuts for us, but increases in overseas aid! It is immoral to cut our pensioners benefits and community centres while we give overseas aid to other countries. This perverse attitude grew from the Victorian middle class influenced by evangelical Christianity, which believed it was a duty to ‘save’ unchristian natives. It became a preference over the British working class which endures today. Characteristic of this is Mrs Jellyby in Dickens’s Bleak House, whose eyes ‘had a curious habit of seeming to look a long way off, as if they could see nothing nearer than Africa’. Like the elites she neglected those around her, including notoriously her own children. Her thoughts were directed instead towards the fictitious African possession of Borrioboola Gha and her idealistic plans for its development.
But as if that were not enough, the Holy Spirit, through the immeasurable grace of redemption also makes us new creations in Christ (cf., 2 Cor. 5:17) and provides entrance into the Kingdom where, by the unmerited grace and Love of the Father, we are seated at His right hand of Christ to share in His reign forever (cf., Eph. 2:6). By this grace granted us through His sacrifice on the cross and His victory over death, we are, upon acting on our faith, made heirs of the Kingdom and the adopted children of the Father. Praised be His Holy Name!
ZP - editing
"Two words, indeed, of praying we remember,
Hi all! I'm am raring to go for the new year! As much as I love the coziness and sentiment of the holidays, come January, I am ready for a fresh, clean start for the new year. I spent Sunday and Monday getting all the Christmas decor packed up and put away and the house looks so simple and clean again:)
JeffJew: They think I’m unresponsive and forgetful!
Felix Wulf signalled the Sorcerer coming on behind that he would streak ahead to scout the path and ensure their safety then he and the mighty tyrannosaur disappeared in the gloom of the close forest path.
Blessings to you all!
“It’s nothing”, I told her. “I just try to treat my passengers the way I would want my mother treated.”
The Kona Odyssey was a very enjoyable experience in the end and I will do it again next year for sure. With another 12 months of riding around the dirt tracks I should be able to feel a lot more comfortable in the technical sections and knock off some time of my record. I'm already looking forward to it.
He was less pleased about his failure to dispose of the Hoover Building, now (despite being occupied by Tesco) one of the great sights on the outskirts of London.
So every time you hear some Democrat bemoan the ill-informed view that America is an underregulated society, tell them to put the above numbers in a pipe and smoke them.
How to store: Refrigerate shredded meat in airtight containers, up to 3 days, or freeze in 2- or 3-cup portions, up to 3 months. If desired, reserve fat and render by cooking over low heat until mostly liquid. Strain and refrigerate; use in place of oil. (you can also make tacos with this pork recipe, just add it to corn tortillas, pico de gallo or salsa and avocado!... YUM!)
SS: That’s what we thrive on, sounds and textures. It’s right to have a word for the record that is a verbal interpretation of a sound.
I hope you all had a wonderful holiday!
So that no one
Spring Onions, 1 stalk, for garnishing
3) Repeat steps 1 & 2 so you have 2 cores full of singles.
As the years pass, remembering where I put my car keys is a challenge, but the memories of those hours growing from childhood to young adult and beyond are as crisp and clear as the autumn sun. How I loved to listen to my grandparents talk about when they were small, and now my children want to know what it was like so very long ago when I was a child.
This is such a favorite game with the girls. I used to play it with them, as did my husband, but they don't ask us to play much anymore. I think we don't play it properly and it is so much more fun when it is the two girls. I love listening to it. This game consumes them sometimes for more than half the day with me being the diner at lunch time and grammy when the couple wants to 'go out' on a date.
But regardless, it doesn’t take a lot of trolling around on the Internet or listening to moms chatting at the park to realize there’s a lot of mom-on-mom violence going down these days, and it burns me up. I remember when my BFF from high school had her first kid, and I went to visit her. Being sort of rules-oriented and somewhat hyper about doing things “right,” I projected myself into her shoes a few years down the road. How, I asked her, did she know what to do?
8 far
Unibroue La Terrible Canada, Belgian Strong Ale, 10.5% abv
Here is the happenings around the Martin house recently.
Freetail opened having only other Texas commercial craft beers on tap but with plans for 13 different beers rotating throughout the year. House beers should be available by mid-December.
The question this second-generation Samsung tablet is trying to answer is not “How much better can it get?” The Samsung Galaxy Tab 2 10.1 stops at how much. It feels safe pretending there’s no such thing as a third-generation iPad.
Vera Farmiga, Up in the Air
This was in no way a genuine English fox hunt, for there were no pedigreed foxhounds at hand--merely rangy, obnoxious and uncouth coondogs--among other lesser breeds ... neither was any individual in this hunting party attired in proper foxhunting habiliment, which was comprised of both Lester and his cousin Luther DooLittle, the infamous artificer Lamar Beefeater and the oft-avoided Ansel Poteet Junior--rather, they were all clad in well-worn and threadbare flannels, along with ragged denim britches ... nary a hunter rode upon the back of a well-behaved steed befitting of the sport--just listless and broke-down work mules ... needless to say--the fox was at great advantage! ... and if this confederate group could not possibly be more undignified or pathetic, every now and again Lester DooLittle would give forth a tawdry blast "Bluurrrpppp!" from a cheap tin bugle previously acquired in a swap for half a poke of "baccy" ... thus was the scene as those hounds snuffed the ground in a near-futile attempt at unraveling the tangled and twisted scent by mimicking every elusive move made by the now resting fugitive sitting motionless at the feet of Virgil Hunnicutt ... it took the better part of the afternoon for that pack of tiring coondogs to retrace the exact path of their majestic fellow canine before finally heading around the side of the store and returning from the other to the front ... then all activity abruptly halted and time stood still but for a fleeting moment ... then fire and brimstone was at once unleashed as that mob of hounds laid eyes on the subject of all their toilsome efforts crouching there next to Virgil Hunnicutt ... it was a horrendous assault as those angry dogs converged and fell upon that fox, along with Virgil ... alas fur flew ... slobbers were slung ... fragments of clothing were strewn ... checkers and checkerboard went airborne ... shrieks and cries for help were heard before Lester DooLittle and his collaborators were able to rescue the piteous Virgil Hunnicutt from the iron jaws of the relentless, mauling curs before they mercilessly tore the man to shreds ... fortunately Virgil was relatively uninjured considering the viciousness of the onslaught, yet suffered from numerous and painful bites and countless stinging abrasions ... it could have been much worse ... somehow that sly fox had managed to escape virtually unscathed and almost unnoticed from the midst of the mayhem ... and now a superbly enraged Uncle Virgil was about to give all present an overflowing earful as he proclaimed "fellers, that was the absolute worst attack on one of God's most grand and gracious creatures that I have ever seen ... an honourable mammal of the highest level of knowledge, intelligence and wisdom ... an adroit and ingenious beast of the loftiest order ... a far superior being than that of its motley peers ... a productive yet unassuming social being ... a master of its domain shamefully mishandled and abused ... a ah ahh uh" ... Grandpa DooLittle could stand to hear no more and thus interrupted "whoa, whoa, hold on there fer a minute Hunnicutt ... that ol' fox weren't hurt none ... he got away without barely as much as a brush of a tooth and sauntered directly back into that there corn field from whence he came" ... Uncle Virgil Hunnicutt stared disdainfully at Grandpa DooLittle for a bit until the silence became unnerving before audaciously replying "well DooLittle ... I wasn't speaking of that fox ... I was referring to myself!"
Alton has been very supportive of this blog and has offered several very helpful suggestions regarding how to make it better. When he told me he had written up a piece on the possibility of living Pterosaurs/Thunderbirds I knew it would be a great fit for this blog. Alton's piece is below:
I guess you'll have to wait and see!
A month ago, my mom found out her breast cancer has returned.
It’s been exactly two years since I started this blog and the difference it has made to my life has been remarkable. Not the writing part; I’ve always done that. Even when I wasn’t writing for publication, I was wittering away on internet forums or clogging up Facebook with my rantings. No, it’s the inspiration. It’s like being in love. You know, the butterflies-in-the-tummy feeling you get that makes you feel like you’ll just burst if you don’t shout it from the rooftops – that’s how I feel when I hear a great song. It goes far beyond just transforming my mood or giving me an idea. The word “inspiration” is related to breathing, and that’s how essential and natural this process is. I might have a conscious discipline to blog every day, but that just facilitates my discovery of these wonderful tunes – the words that appear on the screen are just a manifestation, a by-product of the process. If I couldn’t write, I’d just have to speak about it, and if I couldn’t speak I’d grunt and gibber. I’d point. I’d take you by the hand and drag you over to the record player. This. Hear it. Now.
So besides doing nothing, getting alot of rest and being outside (until we froze in -20C weather) and stocking up on tylenol and advil, they had a great train set that the kids kept playing with, taking apart, making changes and putting back together.
By this morning (before the news broke) some had even written and published article such as this assuming they had already been gifted with the outcome they so desired. And as far as this writer was concerned he was so clearly over-excited by his wish fulfillment fantasy that I rather suspect he typed his article with his one free hand. (I bet he cries himself to sleep tonight)
pizzas. In fact, it slid quite easily into my freezer, which is a side one and therefore
Racing is a full-time job. It involves focus and stamina. Sometimes I think Junior would be content in the middle of Lake Norman with a fishing pole. Think about it. He does everything he can to keep the public away from him. He builds his own bars, keeps graveyards of badly wrecked race cars, won’t introduce anyone to his girlfriend(s). He’s odd. Sometimes it seems like he would rather be anywhere but here. He knows he has a responsibility to fulfill though, so he keeps racing. Maybe that’s why he seems unhappy.
Power Stars to Bowser
Like any good job hunter I’ve spent hours on Google researching the do’s and the don’ts about interview etiquette. I’ve learned what to talk about (me) and what not to talk about (my tattoos apparently are a no no but that’s a WHOLE other blog). What surprised me was to learn that something as innocent as a quick spray of perfume can ruin your chances of the getting the job. Apparently the interviewer might have had a recent bad breakup with a girlfriend who just happened to wear the same perfume as you. As soon as he gets a whiff of you, you can kiss that job goodbye. Unfair eh? So the general consensus is: very light makeup – which is fine for me anyway as I only ever wear a bit of eyeshadow, mascara and lip gloss. No nail varnish or if you must a neutral shade of pink or peach. Jewellery is also a no no. No earrings and if you want to wear a necklace make sure it’s a simple gold or silver one. Rings – again no unless they are your engagement/wedding rings.How did I get my previous jobs? I’ve always worn perfume, nail polish and jewellery. Ok I’m not like this:
and I’ll drink
All the years I was home-schooling her (she’d never been to school until she started college), I was so afraid that I was making a mistake somehow, that maybe I would hurt her, short-change her by home-schooling her.
I hate phones. It’s hard for me to talk if I can’t use my hands. Even back when real people answered, I preferred to go into a business and discuss my problem with another face. Now, even if I go in with a bill in my hand, they point me to a phone on the wall and tell me the extension to dial. I long to be two years old, so I can drop to the floor and throw a temper tantrum.
Morello: Adjudicator.
to you whoever you are from your true love.
2. If you were forced to give up chocolate or potato chips for an entire year which one would you choose to live without? I don’t eat potato chips anymore, but I’d rather give up something sweet than something salty.
Dad was a phantom never took a look at him
The world is sleeping in the dark
Molecular biology has pointed us toward solutions by uncovering complex arrays of sensory, signaling, and decision-making networks in all living cells. In many cases we can enumerate network components and interactions, although in no case can we be sure the list is complete.
36. Teeth
(older unfinished)
a normal and natural thing to do at the time. Her words worked on my
The menu is simple because I literally made everything in less than an hour during a break in classes. The pizza is the deep dish crust (my favorite crust EVER!) from 500 Vegan Recipes. I didn't follow a recipe for the scramble. Just tofu, turmeric, garlic pepper, parsley, bell pepper, and onion. I made a super quick tomato sauce and topped the scramble with tempeh bacon and Daiya.
-I am sad at how much you hated having to rely on others to care for you in the end
You may also read my article, meditation as a way to divinity – the link is available on the site-map on the right hand banner.
“And foreigners who bind themselves to the LORD
Have you ever heard of the diathesis-stress model? No?
It's Christmas vacation, which means I've had both kiddos at home. Together. AllDayLong. I suspect that Christmas vacation was the original inspiration for spiked egg nog. (Although I do believe it was a stroke of genius that inspired us to get Ben a PSP and Olette a Leapster2 this year. They are more than happy to go outside in order to earn video game time!)
I don't know now which of us suggested the holiday - neither of us had any money and it was just another one of those things I should really have known better than to do. But when you've taken so much time and trouble to mess up almost everything, the idea of running away is very beguiling, so we looked on the Teletext listings anyway. And as we scrolled through screen after screen of bargain-priced offers for a week in the sun, the idea took hold. I'd never been on a holiday with a girl friend before, and we didn't even know each other very well, but a quick phone call to a bored-sounding holiday operator, a reckless charge to my credit card, and without even knowing where we'd be staying, we were booked for a week in the Canary Islands.
Nestie square
So there's what I've been browsing online for. My birthday is coming up soon so I'm going to add some cute sandals to my wishlist.
Port a Pong and the Jewel Basket are both Our contests of the day!! Get an extra entry daily EACH in any contest by entering them and by posting you read it in the header! You must enter Port a Pong Daily first to get a bonus entry!
Grandma took the day off from work to spend time with us. We had lunch at Bob Evans, and Papaw even managed to sneak away from work for a few minutes. As you can tell, they're very happy to have the little man around.
Known as one of the grimiest emcee's in the game who possessed one of the most distinct voices we've ever heard, Sha was a staple in Queens hardcore and underground Hip-Hop. A member of his own group the Killa Kidz who released a sorted number of 12" vinyl singles over the years, Sha lived Hip-Hop. He was definitely grounded but also collaborated many times with Queens and Queensbridge royalty like Large Professor, Marley Marl, Cormega, Noreaga, Imam Thug, Screwball, Mobb Deep and perhaps most frequently, Tragedy Khadafi.
ManageEngine to Debut Private Social Network Exclusively for IT at Interop – ManageEngine, the real-time IT management company, today announced the debut of ITPulse, the industry’s first private social network exclusively for IT teams. ITPulse engages and socializes IT teams by establishing a one-stop, cascading wall for real-time display of IT infrastructure health and collaboration in a secure and fun environment. Integrated out-of-the-box with the company’s OpManager and ServiceDesk Plus, ITPulse can also be integrated via an API for third-party tools, such as BMC, CA, HP, IBM and others.
May I anticipate two objections here.
If you've got about 4 minutes you can relive our day (at least the best parts!)
Why, Bravo? Were you that desperate for some filler material? Because I have to tell you, this was the most irrelevant 3 minutes of air time in the history of television.
And Saroyan’s genius is for the incidental, the real, the hard-boiled sentimental. His story about the massacre of seventy thousand Assyrians starts with him going into a barber shop (if I remember rightly) and what follows is a musing on man’s inhumanity to man. Now the thing is I am certain that this story was, in fact, seeded in a barbershop. In fact there are probably tours organised by the Saroyan Society to that very barber shop - undoubtedly in Fresno – where they will point out the chair that he sat at and the names of his barbers. The place will so reek of Saroyan that you will be surprised the face in the mirror is not his but yours.
holding the sun to my lips
every spirit of blight and destruction from the land.
Jacob and Sarah couldn't wait for Adam's race to be done and their's to begin. Thankfully there were some activities to do and some friends to chat with while we waited and before they knew it, it was their turn. They were so giddy at the starting line!! Sarah kept saying she was going to run like the wind! And you know what? She wasn't kidding!
Simplify 101 is also super excited to announce this brand new workshop. In Organize Your Create Space, you’ll learn how to organize your creative space so it inspires you and supports your creative process. You’ll enjoy your creative work even more and have more time to create. Whether you scrapbook, sew, or make cards in a multi-purpose space or one dedicated to your creative work, this online workshop teaches you a step-by-step process to transform your space into an organized and inspiring creative haven. When your creative space is organized so it supports your
Then I found a wonderful website at Angel fire that tells of a water nymph who falls in love with Apollo, the sun God. He rejects her and she is sad. So the other Gods take pity on her and turn her into a sunflower...so now she can follow the sun God forever. Soo romantic....NOT!
"Can I get the bill?"
Garth I thought would be the warrior who did not really respect his woman until he found love but I was surprised. Quick makes Garth a lot more understanding with Clare which was a nice touch. I also liked Clare’s attitude within the story as she is a tough woman but very kind to her people.
And a chapter where there’s gratuitous word count upping by describing and explaining in detail how to set up a proper campfire. I think it probably should be removed. XD
which are reminiscent of the "bleeding effect" between Desmond and Ezio in Assassin's Creed II. And even casual observers can see the similarities between "time rifts" in Singularity and the orange portals from a certain Valve blockbuster:
Crying. Laughing. Hoping. Giving up. Refusing to back down. Doing your best. Trying to do better. Falling. Getting back up again.
Lea Michele is a Winter, so she has the color right. I think the sheer cutout of the top of the dress is making the whole effect “warmer” than it should be, so she is not glowing as she should with a metallic silver. I also think she should have worn her hair down and gotten better make-up done; particularly her lip color which is reading way too warm for her.
The rule is that you can be any word that has a double letter in it. So you can be a grEEn glaSS dOOr. You can be an aPPle but not a banana. You can wish Just JeNNifer HaPPy but you can't wish her birthday.
Some of his objections are big things, such as their credibility about groundbreaking dates and the dubious impact on traffic, the school system and the environment. And some are little things, such as the price of a hot dog at Izod Center and the claim that Yormark starts every work day by rising at 4 a.m.
Mark Denning RN
Today, I am pleased to share with you Retro Mod Clocks stamps and die templates.
It was toward the end of the school year and so we had to run the mile in PE. I didn't mention to anyone that I was pregnant and ran the mile. I hadn't been taking very good care of myself to begin with and that was just the trigger needed. I miscarried in the bathroom stall in the girl's locker room. Once again, the second worst thing to ever happen to me to that moment and like the first worst thing, there were people all around me and I said nothing. I did not call out for help. That day was my 17th birthday.
Wrinkle free
They say that the burka is segregative and stops women from participating in society. How? There are many Muslim women in the UK, who wear the burka and hold professional roles and are contributing to society. So why the scaremongering? Shouldn’t a Muslim woman be able to choose who she interacts with? Should a Muslim woman, or even any woman, open herself up to the whole of society? Where is the respect for women in the modern world, in a non-Muslim society?
“Uhmmm, no” he said. “Why?”
Proverbs 10:2
the government from operating
I hope everyone had an enjoyable weekend, we had a great but busy weekend. Saturday I took my girls shopping for Birthday gifts.......my daughter Maia was invited to a party for her friend and her sister, both have Sept. b-days so they always do one big party for both. Plus my mil celebrated her birthday yesterday, she's a young 81 :)
Today's recipe is a super yummy and easy quick dessert. Pasta Flora as know in Egypt and Greece and some other countries, is a type of cake or tart with jam, also known as Pastfrola or Pasta Frolla (shortbread) in Italy, Argentina, Paraguay, and Uruguay but in these couturiers it's regularly made with Dulce de Leche (type of creamy dessert made from condensed milk). in today's recipe I used strawberry jam as I love it so much, you can use any type of jam you prefer, as you can use any flavor in this cake like vanilla as I used or Almond flavor, lemon, cinnamon, of course it depends on the jam you're going to use, you can also use the amount of jam you want so if you would like the taste to be so sweet you can use more jam and if not so you can use as much as I used here. This recipe is so easy to make only take minutes to be ready so you can prepare it before any guests arrive and serve it with tea or your favorite drink. I Love this dessert so much and I hope you all like it too :)
And, so can we. God is in control. We can be confident of that. God will use the barrage of our troubles to mold us with the truths of His word. We will learn to grow in faith and to realize the awesome depths of God’s love for us.
Four photographers, a videographer, and I waited for the two dozen shuffle-steps Pabon took between precinct and car. It was far less dramatic than his arrest on Staten Island earlier in the day.
1844 Richard D'Oyly Carte, producer of Gilbert and Sullivan operas, was born.
They reached the end of the Shatterbury platform and ran up it and along to the ticket area. At this time of night there was no one else on the platform and the blinds were drawn down over the two teller windows in the cold, echoing ticket hall. The station was deserted, and all Ben could hear was the rhythmic ticking of the digital clock that hung above platform one. Counting down the minutes to the next train.
7:00pm – ‘Ohana Cup – USA Tomahawks v Tonga Mate M’a
today was interesting because I hed to learn Russian because I'll end up hearing it on my mission a lot, I've decided that russian is very ugly compared to ukrainian, mostly today was MDT time or just personal study time so I spent time looking up questions I might be asked on my mission
This is a neat little book, particularly for people who love books. Hell, if you saw that cover and thought, “Neat,” chances are it’s a book you’ll enjoy reading.
I did a good job, but I still see one or two in there and it's bugging me. I mean really bugging me. I returned one of the fish to the tank and hopefully the little fellow will help get this under control.
Today Amanda has three sons of her own and made me the most grateful Nana ever!
The tofu was cut into 16 squares, smoked with oolong tea for 25 minutes, pan-fried in canola oil until golden brown on both sides and finished with 1 tbs. of tamari.
Update . . .
Today my daughter is exactly 17 months old. Soon she’ll be a year and a half, and then before I can blink she’ll be turning 2 years old. Time flies mercilessly by, and in the time I’ve had with her so far, my little princess has never ceased to amaze me.
Why?: Any fic where the Villain tries to protect the hero deserves a look. Also features papa Loki, goat pulled chariots, and reincarnation. The author manages to capture the characters voices even in unusual situations.
Cut to the chase - my good, old friend Mr Simon mentioned a few weeks back that he was on his way over to that part of the world. I duly lashed him to his chair and made him promise to bring back New Glarus beer... Thanks Si!
But in writing this all down to Plan B, I had a thought. I couldn't say that I have ever really consciously thought about which animals are for which gender, but shout an animal at me, and I could probably tell you without a pause which gender it should be for. And why is that? I bet you can do it too. I mulled it over for nearly a whole day, until the only conclusion I could come to was that it comes down to the ferocity of the animal and/or the ickiness.
It's an amazing story. One you can read for yourself at the website. And while Anna's struggle is over, the assignment far from over.
I woke up suddenly during last night, drenched in sweat and with a horrible taste in my mouth. I thought it was kind of weird, but turned over and went back to sleep. When I woke up this morning, I felt incredibly tired and bleary-eyed, but forced myself to go through the motions of getting ready for the day anyway, because that's my job.
Her response was downright mean and likened me to walking into someone's house and stealing.
have come up with. I know I say this every week, but these ladies are beyond talented!
My first radio was a black, sixties, Japanese made transistor brick of no import, given to me by my grandfather when I was no more than six years old. At eight, I received a modern ball-shaped plastic one whose precise, late 60's psychedelic colour now-escapes me, with two dials (for eyes) and a lucite window dial (the nose) for the frequency. Both were 9v powered and limited to AM or FM. At ten, I withdrew my accumulated savings and bought a cool-looking Sears ten band receiver (with all the shortwave spectrum) that called out to me from its display shelf every time I passed enroute to the hardware department with my father. I strung an "X" of wires from the corners of my room in a crude attempt to mimic a di-pole antenna. And with that, the world entered my bedroom through this box, and I was never the same.
90 mins only: Cardiff 4/5 (William Hill), Draw 13/5(Boylesports), Crystal Palace 9/2(Betfair)
My birthday card for Kellie uses the JustRite sets, Elegant Frames and You Inspire Me. The birdhouse was cut using my Gypsy and April Shower's Cartridge. The paper is by Pink Paislee. I added a bit of lace to the roof with glossy accents and while it was still wet I sprinkled glitter over it and added 3 pearls to the roof. I stamped the border in green, cut it out by hand, added a bit of glossy accents to the edge and added more glitter! I used this as the "entrance" to the birdhouse. The sentiment was stamped in brown (Memento Ink) and the banner was handcut. I curved it around a pencil to add a bit of dimension to it. The heart was cut using the Cricut, edges were inked, glossy accents added, and glitter sprinkled! I layered it over the green border, added the banner, and tied seam binding around the front. I cut a butterfly from my Cricut and added that to the birdhouse.
(Sorry. This horrible new version of blogger won't allow me to embed the video.)
Dr. Drip has done nothing for me other than give me a little pep; while valuable, I would not consider it compensation.
A year or so later I started exploring Irish culture a little more (Still haven’t managed to actually get over there though, that is high on my to-do list). To learn a little more about Irish music I went and impulse bought a couple of Irish Music Compilations and quickly found a love for this kind of music growing. Songs such as Midnight Well’s ‘Still Believing’ Tara’s ‘Devil’s Song’ captivated me with the right fast based tempo that I enjoyed and philosophical or at the very least, historical meaning.
As she planned my honeymoon
Serendipity brought forth two:
And generous ways,
Searching for the hope that’s tucked away in you and me
Cornershop Sleep on the left side UK
- Mick Underwood: batterie
In other words he was a villain, a duplicitous bastard, a prick and a special pile of human excrement! But I’m not American; I don’t express myself in such earthy terms. Breitbart did, though his faults are nothing compared with those of the tawdry Kennedy.
And just hang my cradle, mammy mine
TMS Development International was established in 1989 by Managing Director, Catherine Hick, together with the founders of Team Management Systems (TMS), Dr Charles Margerison and Dr Dick McCann. From our offices in York, UK, our own expert team supports an international network of clients and agents who use the TMS Profiles to help individuals, teams and organisations achieve success all over the world in a wide range of scenarios.
Smile, be positive, don’t get discouraged when you fail – Get back up and go for it!
Jeff Hunt (REP) 7.42% 220
Who’s going to bring the jacks and marbles? Dig out some hula hoops and break out the wiffle ball and bat! Someone can print out some jump rope and clapping rhymes and bring them along for those who aren’t as mobile. Rotate yards and times so that everyone can be included. We used to play ball in my back yard and jump rope on my neighbor’s driveway. Red Rover was a couple of doors down and Statue was wherever we were.
To alternate pathways of spirituality
Snail Performance is one of the teams bringing multiple cars to compete in different classes. The car above happens to be their Unlimited AWD WRX that has a few new upgrades this year and one of the most eye catching liveries. Battling the heat and a few bugs, Snail Performance’s WRX was able to take second place with a 1:59.367. Once they get those bugs worked out, this WRX should be one of the fastest cars on track.
Guess I have to get movin' & groovin' with our design for those spaces! As always, I'll be posting before & afters! :)
The American people are part of the problem and have to be a major part of the solution to the losses of American jobs and putting American’s back to work. By working together, Americans can once again be the proud, self-sufficient country that it once was.
Haemarkge mutneun nege bimirira malhaesseo
Number of Star Wars valentines given out = 31
Hanson exposed herself as a run-of-the-mill, hypocritical black racist. Blacks can talk race, race, race, in any way they wish with whites, but if whites are less than deferential, they must have their lives destroyed. But why would a run-of-the-mill black racist call a white talk show host known both for her “conservative” views and for her no-nonsense responses to callers, and then complain that Schlessinger was insensitive?
If you read my post this past Sunday, you may recall that I am having a bit of difficulty answering the question, “What are you looking forward to in the future?”
Reconsider Columbus Day. Really. Are you serious?
- Bud Selig has said he has not received written arguments from the Cubs or Red Sox on the compensation case which clearly indicates nothing is close to being done.
I think of all the Christmas-themed romances I’ve been devouring lately this has been the least “Christmas-y”. True, they find a baby in a manger and Thea is the Vicar’s sister…but other than these satellite references there is no real attachment to the holiday. This is not a book filled with yule-tide greetings and traditions. But it was a lovely winter Romance. Feel free to do this one before or after the holiday season. It’s a nice way to warm up a winter weekend.
Method One – Conversion of Drawings
$150 Billion: Taxpayer Funds For Fannie Mae And Freddie Mac. (Reuters, 3/25/12)
The girls and I took this picture when we delivered pizza to Chad for supper out in Beaufort County.
This back and forth knitting creates so called short-rows, ie you are not knitting all the stitches on the front needle when you do section 3a, you are actually knitting less and less of them, each time you turn your work around to knit or purl. This shapes the heel section 3a into a triangle. When you start knitting section 3b, you are (totally my own words...) essentially making " long-rows", the opposite of short rows by " picking up " the un-knitted stitches ( left out in section 3a, every time you did a short row.)
05. Channel 1 suite - Cinematic Orchestra / 4:11
I'm realizing that some people may be a little scared of my acrylic rings. How will the tall 'face' wear? Will they be knocking it on things?
aware of a year in your distant past
Vesper cleaning actually is really too. I do own a classic dark blue cleaning a lot, but fortunately, these shiny, so they look very rich and powerful. They do not look matte and dull. I have been a dark wash, gloss. Usually dark jeans to attract all the fluff and hair, but these little, even if to do so. This is another bonus.
But he begins to speak his prayer again. “Lord, I don’t know what to ask. Strength? Wisdom? Financial provision? I don’t know… it doesn’t seem to make sense at all. Am I even praying to you in a right way?”
I don’t even truly remember this incident. When I try and pull it up in my mind, all I get is the shadowy almost-memory of a story told so many times, you can almost see yourself there. My mother is the one who always told me this story, until I got older and started repeating it myself to those who queried me in-depth about my dietary choices.
World hunger remains a problem.
Twitter has shown the world an easier way to share content, and I believe every journalist should have an account. For a student journalist like me, having a UNC basketball player Retweet my story would mean at least 10,000 more people have been exposed to my writing. But at what cost?
Fumbles
Bergevin, a Montreal native, served as an Assistant Coach on Joel Quenneville’s staff during the 2008-09 campaign. He also spent three years on the Blackhawks scouting staff, including one as Director of Pro Scouting during the 2007-08 season.
Then I saw a new heaven and a new earth, for the first heaven and the first earth had passed away, and there was no longer any sea. I saw the Holy City, the new Jerusalem, coming down out of heaven from God, prepared as a bride beautifully dressed for her husband. And I heard a loud voice from the throne saying, "Now the dwelling of God is with men, and he will live with them. They will be his people, and God himself will be with them and be their God. He will wipe every tear from their eyes. There will be no more death or mourning or crying or pain, for the old order of things has passed away."
This professionalism does not exist today in our modern democratic police service. When you walk into any charge-office in the main centres of the country you will only find black cops to assist you. Because of the language, the cultural differences and plain lack of dedication for their job, everything works slower than normal. You normally have to wait some time before being served. There is seldom any privacy, and very often you’ll find yourself reporting a minor theft or certifying documents as true originals, while standing shoulder-to-shoulder with another complainant who is reporting a violent assault or rape. Professionalism in our Police Force flew out the window when the Marxist ANC Government took charge of things, but yet they keep spending and spending millions of rands to improve things!
Other countries, other cultures and peoples are preserving the Nazi legacy, if only as a warning, if only so history can be learned from. But in this age of American Commercial Imperialism, who's going to be keeping as non adulterated as possible a time-line via historical artifacts and literature and art, the lessons and relevance of Chattle Slavery; You had a bed, a chair, a horse and a slave. And the horse cost more than the nigger.
He then reportedly hit the 22-year-old in the face with a plastic bag, prompting Gunn and his local girlfriend to come to the receptionist’s aid.
It was one of those impossible dangerous things that only invincible high school kids even try: running in the dark, all the way from Detroit to Windsor, underneath the river. When I think back, I still get kind of quaky and I can't believe we got away untouched. It didn't work out like that for everyone.The descriptions of this run are frankly terrifying. Danger is present at every stage. At the very outset due to the fixed time that one has to make it through the tunnel before the next train passes through, the peril of losing one's footing due to sleepers or rats beneath, the scrapes and bruises from clashing with the tunnel wall; just look at the picture on the front cover above and say ready, steady, go to yourself without a little hint of panic and you're a braver man than I. The competitive streak in both men is well drawn, as is their almost nerd-like obsession with details about rivals, lifestyle and results. It's a breathless beginning and a great introduction to MacLeod's physical world.
In that instant and in that sea of yellow and green, all are brothers and sisters. Brothers and sisters with different skin colour , with different background, but with one purpose in mind.
If you so decide to do this be careful about what kind of ads appear in your book. For example if you have a Christian Romance book you don’t want your reader to “turn the page” and see an ad for pornography.
I felt for those little girls. They way they played dollies. Pretended to be mummies. Dressed up in heels and pushed their prams around. Where were they?
Under the rule of reason, the finder of fact must determine if the practice at issue is "reasonably within the patent grant, i.e., that it relates to subject matter within the scope of the patent claims." If the practice does not "broaden the scope of the patent, either in terms of covered subject matter or temporally," then the patentee is not chargeable with patent misuse. More specifically, "the finder of fact must decide whether the questioned practice imposes an unreasonable restraint on competition, taking into account a variety of factors, including specific information about the relevant business, its condition before and after the restraint was imposed, and the restraint’s history, nature and effect." Va. Panel, 133 F.3d at 869, quoting State Oil Co. v. Khan, 522 U.S. 3, 10 (1997); see also Monsanto Co., 363 F.3d at 1341.
Alex 1:19 PM
Power Trip
Getting a package from most Etsy sellers is like having a party on a day that isn't your birthday! I received my second order from "Dime Store Chic," and I took my sweet time opening the box and admiring my treasures.
dive down & kick up the silt
Oh and the kids were awesome and napped together, so I got a short nap in this afternoon :)
Eligibility: This competition is open to all visual artists who are 18 years of age or older. All styles and media are eligible.
As Vivaldi's Gloria operatically plays on the soundtrack, we see shots of the train car barreling ahead to certain doom—and on top of it is Manny, battling the elements but standing upright in a cruciform position. After all the clumsy speechifying, Konchalovsky finally allows an inspired image to suggest everything the film's dialogue had made explicit about the humanity of its characters and the nature of their freedom/imprisonment. By making this choice—to die as a free man rather than return to prison as less than a man—he has found his own kind of autonomy, and exults in this knowledge even as he braces himself for death.
- I read 51 books! -
Lloyd Cole & The Commotions Perfect skin UK
As cogently explained to me, for gamers, the amounts expended on virtual goods have to be compared with an alternative expenditure for other forms of entertainment. Compare the $20-dollars or more (choose your exact price, local currency and exchange rate) paid for a two-hour movie with the cumulative engagement of a game such as Farmville, where each single outlay for a virtual item is a mere fraction of the cost of the movie. At the end of the day, there is no real difference between paying for two hours of pleasure via the celluloid screen and the untold hours tending to one's virtual farm and ensuring that you have the necessary implements to do so. Both are popular forms of entertainment based on the enjoyment of a vicarious reality.
for now, you just decide that there is nothing too bad with morality
MICHAEL C. HALL / Dexter Morgan – “DEXTER” (Showtime)
Zombieland, on the other hand, takes the genre and makes it funny, a lot like Shaun of the Dead did but using a title that starts with Z and doesn't compete with Star Wars for inclusion in my A-Z Challenge. Come for the double-tap, stay for Bill Murray's biggest regret. Zombieland had a great style, and the acting in it was perfect...the cast played it like it was real without overacting or getting too campy, which can work if done right (see Evil Dead 2), but that's a crap shoot that can kill a movie if it backfires.
Second, it matters because it might be a waste of $2 bucks. "What?"
Continuing with installing VRTSob 3.2.514.0
I almost teared up. I was SO proud. Not once did she bring up Santa or even gifts! What a sweet girl.
Carminic Acid – See Carmine.
It’s important to identify if you are dealing with a control freak then develop healthy strategies to communicate. These people obsessively try to dictate how you’re supposed to be and feel. They have an opinion about everything; disagree at your peril. They’ll control you by invalidating your emotions if those don’t fit into their rulebook. Controllers often start sentences with, “You know what you need?”…then proceed to tell you. They’ll sling shots like, “That guy is out of your league” or” I’ll have dinner with you if you promise to be happy.” People with low self-esteem who see themselves as “victims” attract controllers. Whether spouting unsolicited advice on how you can lose weight or using anger to put you in your place, their comments can range from irritating to abusive. What’s most infuriating about these people is that they usually don’t see themselves as controlling–only right.
And the melody that He gave to me, within my heart is ringing.
Well, it seems another January has come and gone. If the mountains of snow all around us are any indication, I really picked a good month to be closed this year. It's been a great month of travel, leisure, family, fun, and frolic. Dont' worry, I've been home for the past week, so I got a good taste of the weather you enjoyed all month.
*Guinsoo gulps.*
by Joshua Cohen on October 3rd, 2010
Doctor: “Well, how are you ever going to write for a national newspaper if you don’t go to college?”
1/2 cup mirin
You can also use the search box to find other files and folders that you want to see—fast—without having to dig through the mounds of files and remember which folder that you put your document in.
Re: Lazarus “falling asleep”. According to the notes, “falling asleep” was a common euphemism for death, not only amongst the Jews but among all people. Sort of like “passed” is the modern euphemism for dying.
So, ok, I don’t have iSys anymore and won’t touch Zend’s Lucene again with a 10′ pole (don’t get me started). I’ve got MSSQL Full Text running on my box now with about 8.5 million items indexed. So I pump those items in my newly installed Solr and compare search times and quality.
Then there is a mother who is a different creature. She spends a lot of time pondering her children and their lives. She analyses her choices. She is not content with having someone else raise them (sometimes, to educate them). She wants to be with her children but she can't sit through lengthy floor-time. She has many personal needs and sees all the needs of her child. She desperately needs to give expression to other aspects of herself. Alone time is almost always for creativity (in the broadest sense). She is not fulfilled by her mothering role. She is a mindful mother, but she is more. She often struggles with the conflicting aspects.
But how do I do this, what is goal, where is the end line?
"They're telling me how to run my organization. I'd like to get this resolved, but I'm not going to give up my authority to the federal government. It's as simple as that," Arpaio added.....
The same week my mother-in-law had her stroke, my father-in-law had some dental work done and had a tooth extracted. Something didn’t go well and he was losing a lot of blood and he too ended up being hospitalized in the same hospital as my mother-in-law on March 8th.
Pendleton said he ordered vegetables instead of fries with his chicken sandwich. When he started to eat his broccoli, he saw something gray on the plate he at first thought was a mushroom. "I start to turn it over. I see this gray-green patch," he said.
Top Hat
The Gorhoffedd, 12thC Brittonic heroic poem
Of course it would have been completed four months ago before she actually arrived in the world if it hadn't been for that pesky eight week hospital sojourn (giving it a sweet name derived from old French makes it sound so much more appealing!).
Hele put her arms around me in confession. “We decided to go back to Cluny for lunch. We’ve been drinking wine all afternoon. It was wonderful!!!”
Farm-raised Fish are Fattier
I'll cherish that Zippo for the rest of my life (despite the obvious provenance) and I will ensure that Galadriel inherits it when I pass on.
You belong here if … you go to the only school you’ve ever heard of that owns an organ more expensive than two of your homes, maybe more.
It grows to 70–150 cm tall. The leaves have a gentle lemon scent, related to mint. During summer, small white flowers full of nectar appear. These attract bees, hence the genus name Melissa (Greekfor ‘honey bee’). Its flavour comes from citronellal (24%), geranial (16%), linalyl acetate (12%) and caryophyllene (12%).
Wayne worked all day on his paper work.
The story of bin Laden's courier was an open invitation for past and present CIA officials who had gone along with the use of torture in interrogating suspects to justify their position. CIA Director Panetta channeled their viewpoint in an interview with NBC, suggesting that, for some of the information that led the agency to bin Laden, interrogators, "used their enhanced interrogation techniques against some of the detainees." He added, "Whether we would have gotten the same information through other approaches I think is always going to be an open question." Reuters reported that the story of how the administration learned about the identity of bin Laden's courier was, "certain to reopen the debate over practices that many have equated with torture."
so, here i am. talking to all y'all because it's keeping me busy and keeping me from fretting.
In Alexandria, persistent Mona pleads with Sophie Winston to find her missing daughter Linda who vanished five years ago. Sophie explains she has never found a missing person and is not an investigator. Meanwhile her ex-husband Mar’s girlfriend Natasha wants to star on TV so she arranges with Tear It Up With Troy to fix up the backyard; however, she uses Sophie’s backyard as their venue.
So, as is the case with all the String Theory challenges, the challenge here is for everyone to use a common string in their work. For this, i simply divided my tile into 4, then divided them again, through the diagonals, creating 8 special-right triangles. (Each triangle has a 90 degree and two 45 degree angles)
out. Upon entering the
B. The New Testament
Maggie is a seventeen year old girl who's had a bad year. She was smart and on track but then her mom left, her dad is depressed, she's graduating, barely, and her boyfriend of almost three years dumped her for a college football scholarship. Lately she thinks life is all about hanging on by a thread and is gripping tight with everything she has.
Which vision will carry the day? As cities begin to go bankrupt and states totter on the brink of insolvency, we will see.
So now Canero will be fighting Matthew Hatton, although he's far from the fighter that his brother was, he still has some pieces of his brother's game in his repertoire. Both of the Hatton brothers have been very active in Soccer/Football. And both of them have very good foot work. Most of the fighters that Canero has fought have been old washed up flat footed fighters, like Carlos Baldomir & Lovemore N'dou. So you have to question whether Hatton's footwork will bother Canero. Canero has never really fought a true "boxer" and even though I don't consider Hatton a true boxer, he does have the footwork to evade the slow fisted Canero and possibly counter him all night. But you have to wonder how well Hatton will be able to move around and be elusive with all the extra weight on him. He has never fought at 154.
Agency Youth has an 85% attendance rate when the district’s goal is above 90%. While the program boasts that 84% of its students are “successfully re-entering regular school” there is no accountability for how many of those students return to the program, drop out, or are placed in other post failure programs.
To overcome these consumer barriers, we focus on two main advantages asset-based long-term care enjoys over its health-based counterparts: (1) a death benefit is paid to beneficiaries should the policyholder die and it has not been exhausted by long term care expenses, and (2) guaranteed premiums are available. Put simply, this is not use-it-or-lose-it coverage and it is not budget-busting coverage that could bring financial surprises in future years. This adds a great deal of value and peace of mind that customers may not see with other forms of long-term care coverage.
We were given a some welsh lamb and the ingredients to make a welsh lamb stir fry from the Cool2Cook2 book which has been produced by Meat Promotion Wales (Hybu Cig Cymru) to help get kids cooking.
After high school I moved away, but distance made me miss my 'family' and we continued to have a cordial albeit superficial relationship. My father continued to refuse to speak about my mother, but if we kept the conversation geared toward weather and work, we were fine. It continued that way for over a decade.
And that means: you CAN’T just find and replace all mentions of “twenty-three” with “seventeen” and slap YA on the cover page of your manuscript.
"Yes. We are all born naked. It's natural. Now just don't go around saying that."
the colours of our lives
Secondly, Stallone made an interesting choice when writing the novelization for Rocky 2. Most novelizations I’ve read are written in third person; this one is written in the first person! In fact, Rocky is relating his story to us as the narrator. This is fantastically weird, considering one of the most endearing traits about Rocky Balboa is that he’s not the brightest bulb in the chandelier. In other words, LOTS of apostrophes are used to shorten off words into a form that simulates a less educated person’s dialect.
So most of my knitting happens in groups of women. Places where women are talking. I sit, and chat or listen, and I knit.
Happy Mother’s Day to all the mothers out there. It’s the most important job in the world!
In this section we have only examined a few examples of the concept of irreducible complexity. In fact, most organs and systems in living things possess the feature. On the biochemical level in particular, systems function by the working together of a number of independent parts, and cannot by any means be reduced to further simplicity. This fact invalidates Darwinism, which tries to account for the design in life by natural influences. Darwin said that “if it could be demonstrated that any complex organ existed, which could not possibly have been formed by numerous, successive, slight modifications, my theory would absolutely break down.” Today, modern biology has revealed countless examples of this. One can only conclude, then, that Darwinism has “absolutely” broken down.
Those of you that know me realise that I subscribe to the photographic persuasion that believes “if the subject doesn’t have eyes, its boring”. Well soon to be stunned reader, I let you into a revelation, Seascape photography is complex, difficult and anything but boring. The waves don’t stand still, they refuse to take direction, they will not reset because the photographer would like to change angle. Then there is the lighting, you can’t move light modifiers to suit a new composition and try placing a flag or gobo on the rapidly rising sun. Sure there are clouds to help soften or spread the light, but lets face it they drift around aimlessly anyway.
There is a bird on your head.
The Banded Skyrim Firedrake (Draccus caelolumbus plagosus) is one of nature’s most majestic creatures. Fully forty feet in wingspan, these beautiful animals have long lived in the far northern reaches of the Empire of Tamriel, at the top of the food chain, safe from harm.
On the way to the clinic, I realized how my mom must have felt every time she and my sister had to rush me to a hospital because of stomach pains. To her credit, Katie behaved well during the journey. I kept on telling her “malapit na” (we’re already near) whenever she appeared to be getting impatient.
They searched Roberts and found two plastic bags in his anus. That's right, his anus.
It happens at the start of every November: the Scorpio Races. Riders attempt to keep hold of their water horses long enough to make it to the finish line. Some riders live. Others die.
Tashi Tsering
In Los Angeles, working in the film industry, I hosted many dinner parties and culled most of my recipes from the above mentioned cookbooks. I bought this chocolate desserts cookbook on sale on a whim and tested many of its recipes at my dinner parties.
You guys are awesome!
You are surrounded by people
One of the pieces they had was a round tufted ottoman that simply needed a little makeover. The size was perfect for the space, but the colors and style were off. Instead of tossing it and buying something new, I suggested getting it reupholstered. It was in perfectly good shape and I knew I could transform it into a piece that would be absolutely perfect for their new design plan.
02 Chuck
i ran some treated lutradur (brushed with iridescent medium and allowed to dry first) through my inkjet to print it with a photo of the blue granite gravel in my front yard - it's great texture! i cut out a crane shape from it, then fused it with bonash powder in between two layers of ultra-light lutradur. i had tinted the top layer with purple ink that i blended from primary colors, and the bottom layer with yellow ink. i love how the purple fibers pop against the yellow (click the pic to zoom in).
“Happy Birthday. I got you a beach umbrella”
of love and life and fear,
“So he’s at home all alone? He sits and waits for his mother in a dark house while you’re here making dinner for a stranger? Making my dinner!”
Begin by cutting your materials into strips and cutting a fringe into both long sides, as shown here. The size you use will depend on the width and fullness you want for your flower. I used pieces about seven inches long by about two and one-half to three inches wide, depending on which layer I was cutting.
Thus, four hours to make the ribbons ONCE the printing is done…and the amount of time for eco printing is another story…Slow Cloth indeed.
The maestro concluded: “This country is simply impossible. I think I’ll have a coffee too.” (The Maias, Ch. VIII, 192)
We have been busy busy both at home and out and about this week and I have a lot to share, but I keep getting distracted by the garden this time of year.
10/Jun/11
Your Baby Can Walk! might just be a smash hit. It could offer almost guaranteed results like: Your child will learn to walk by age two or your money back. Most children would in fact learn to walk while using the system. People would start to swear by it. They would praise the great results they got from using it. Competitors would start popping up, claiming to get your baby walking sooner, better, faster. Maybe so many parents would start using these products, that in only a few generations, people might forget that all babies used to learn to walk without them.
That was a great day.
The faster you can traverse this graph, the faster you will unlock business value. Unfortunately, you only have a finite amount of time and resources, so you can’t run a search by producing all possible product variations and seeing how they sell. Plus, the search space is infinite. So, you have to make predictions. You look for ways to eliminate certain paths and to get more information about other paths without actually implementing them. Whatever your methods are for figuring out what to produce, they are all based around searching the solution space as fast and efficiently as possible.
When in his late 30s and single, Nerburn worked as a sculptor, but it was tough to make ends meet. He started driving a cab during the night shift. One night, he responded to a call at 2:30 a.m. from someone living at a four-plex near the University of Minnesota...
And not in the Oh Woe Is Me Why The Fuck Am I Doing This To Myself kind of way either. But like a real introspective I Think There's A Deep Down Reason For This kind of way.
Allow Eva herself to explain:
JS – Perhaps the speeding analogy needs an extra dimension; a speeder being convicted on the evidence of other speeders and all but one speeder getting away with it. I’m not entirely convinced the second jury got it right, but if they did, I think a perjurer was convicted on the evidence of other perjurers, or worse, alleged criminals who bribed witnesses, withheld evidence, hacked phones and perverted the course of justice. I don’t just mean those from the News of the World, or those who had their evidence discredited, or the ones charged with perjury but never taken to court, I’m including the witnesses from the SSP United Left faction who appeared to change their story from one trial to the next, and decided to deliver handwritten notes of SSP minutes to police after the first trial had concluded. Alan McCombes had been to jail for contempt of court for refusing to hand over the minutes, however the handwritten notes had been in Barbara Scott’s handbag the whole time. That’s all just my opinion of course.
I'm Out and We'll Talk Later!!!!
Check out the awesome shoes above, designed in a collaboration between Gorillaz and Converse. Gorillaz co-founder Jamie Hewlett designed the prints for the Gorillaz Chuck Taylor All Star Collection, which will be available to buy from February 14th.
Attend this event to obtain info on:
1/4 tsp almond extract
I suspect each and every novel I write will take on a life of its own, which is a good thing, but also means the process won't ever look exactly the same. What worked last time may be worthless this time. Or parts of the process may work just fine, but I may look at others and think, How on earth did I ever think it was a good idea to do it like that?
At first, I thought it was just a mash injury, which hurts like hell for a few minutes then goes away.
Victoria’s Secret’s main clothing line is actually called Moda International, so I’ve decided to start using the proper name. The other line is Body by Victoria. I think I only have one “Body” piece.
My first impression of the State Library of Queensland (SLQ), and the writer’s festival in general, was a slightly panicked one. I was running late. My first panel was due to start at 1:00pm – it was 12:50pm when I caught my first glimpse of it all… as my car sailed over the new “Go-Between” bridge and into the city!
Some parents choose to argue about or defend their choices, which is also a fine approach as far as it takes you. Personally, I have found that most parents who choose non-traditional parenting methods have a deep emotional attachment to their choices and to their position; that only makes sense, because if you're really sold on something it is natural to have an emotional attachment to it. Unfortunately, that also means that when your beliefs are under fire you are likely to act with emotion. Now, I have been involved in conflict virtually my entire professional career, and not once have I seen emotion win an argument over logic. In fact, I have never seen emotion win an argument, period. I have seen tempers flare, feelings irreparably damaged, and punches thrown, but I've never seen two parties engage in any sort of learning when one or more of them is working from emotion.
One ounce of chia supplies 42% of your daily fiber requirement, as well as 4 grams of protein, 18% of the calcium RDA, 27% of phosphorus, 30% of manganese, and nearly 5000 mg of Omega-3 fatty acids. All that nutrition for only 137 calories. You can blend two tablespoons (1 ounce) with fruit juice, kombucha, or a smoothie; mix it with yogurt or cereal; or slug it down fast with a glass of water. I've been taking chia daily for about two years, and when I miss a day, I feel like, well, crap.
X -X-Trail. We sold it and I miss it! We still hav'nt bought another car yet, and in the meantime I'm driving my daughters car (since she's in China).
cost nothing, don't you think?
Why do so many people associate being Catholic with being racked by guilt and not joy? In my lifetime I have certainly made enough mistakes and turned my back on God at different times to deserve to feel guilty so why does so called 'Catholic Guilt' not apply to me? If I ever feel guilty about something, then I tend to realise that this is precisely because I've done something wrong, not because of the church trying to make me feel that way.
07. Dupree's Paradise (tape flip at 7:54 - patched with WIU2B-LudzNL version from 7:54 - 8:12, part of monologue still missing)
There is still time for you to purchase a set of Bunny Ears before the big egg hunt this Saturday!! Especially if you're wanting some of the pre-made ones. Just give me a holler, I'd love to send you a set or two!
I went for the more expensive beer, and had to love Charlie Pride on the jukebox.
about the assembly
We were supposed to start on Friday with a new kit, but we decided to launch it on Monday. I hope you'll join us so we can have fun together - and we promise, fun will be plentiful here.
So we met at Panera today because "This is the last place that people would expect to see Phyllis," she explained as she looked around the room. "And Phyllis blends in at Panera," she says while wearing a turban and big sunglasses. Did I also mention that Phyllis was carrying a pet carrier that looks like a purse and had one of her cats in it?
JPY: 0.227 mg, a new all-time low
10/24 – Baltimore, MD – Sonar
May the Spirit strip away the surface level need to impress and compete with our sisters in Christ and create genuine, real, honest unity that only comes through Him.
I was teasing but I took it too far and did not heed his warning. I really don't want to be spanked the next few days!
And when we’re talking about adolescent obesity, the conversation must go more than skin deep – i.e. be more than about the aesthetics of fat. The health risks of obesity are significant and well-documented, and include, in addition to increased risk of heart disease, an increased likelihood of high blood pressure , diabetes , breathing problems, persistent digestive problems such as acid reflux, as well as potentially life threatening sleep apnea. In addition, adolescent obesity is associated with an increased risk of emotional problems, including lower self-esteem, depression, anxiety, and social isolation.
he doesn't wake up crying but is it a control pattern if i'm okay with night nursing and just see it as him checking in with me since he's not even always nursing? i don't see it as stuffing his feelings with my boob especially considering that i don't stuff or squelch his feelings any other time.
The night sky suddenly exploded with the light of God’s glory, a bright light that revealed the menacing form of an angel standing nearby. The sight of the angel terrorized these veteran guardians of the night. Had the angel of death come for them? This season, Hallmark will design, print, distribute and sell millions of Christmas cards. Many of these cards will bear images of cuddly, winged, and romantic looking angels. I doubt that any will bear the intimidating visage of “an angel from the Lord” who frightened to death those veteran shepherd-warriors, and who therefore uttered to them, “Do not be afraid” (Luke 2:9-10).
I put ice on it the moment I got into the house, telling myself that I must have just re-bulged a disc. Which seemed innocent enough at the time, because 2 1/2 years ago, I bulged my c5/c6 and have also bulged my L5/S1 and L4/L5 — all due to a long history of improper heavy rotational lifting during my teen years — something I have been paying for in adulthood, but I’ll discuss that in a future post.
Sierra Leoneans take danger in their stride with a cheerful grin on a daily basis. On my way into work, I see young lads on rollerskates being pulled along on a rope by some handy passing vehicle they’ve hitched onto. Trucks over-flowing with people sitting on top, standing on the back, waving at passers-by, not a handhold or a care in the world. Motorcycles driving the wrong way down the road to avoid a traffic jam. And that’s just the roads!
I'll definitely be trying to get my hands on the next books in this series, because I love fast, easy reads.
- next alternate between a little of the flour mix and a little milk until its all used up and mixed in.
I discussed with Peter that my brother was very critical and judgemental but that he wasn’t aware of what he was doing. Peter replied “you can make excuses”. I wondered what the heck he was saying, so repeated that I didn’t believe it was intentional, and as he so often did, he repeated “you can make excuses”. Now I was getting ticked off because I felt I wasn’t being “heard”, but then it dawned on me what he was saying and I got it! It’s what I would do! I’d make excuses for someone else’s bad behaviour toward me, would adamantly defend they weren’t intentionally trying to hurt or upset me, and I’d just accept the bad behaviour even though it was to my detriment. Was quite eye opening for me! I’ve noted “GOT TO STOP!”.
JONATHAN
Will I have a happy life?
The kids and I had the great opportunity to review Time4Learning for 30 days. I can't believe our time is up, it went by so very fast. The kids really enjoyed using this program as did I. One of the best features of this program, in my opinion, is that it allows the kids to feel a sense of independence during the learning process.
Golden Smog+
EMPLOYEE: (without looking at the computer) Yeah, that’s in the fashion section downstairs.
Who Needs to be Rich and High Profile When You Can Look Famous with Replica Style?
“You!” she spat. “You lazy good for nothing peabrain! I thought I’d got rid of you forever. The ad said no men trouble, freedom, opportunities for travel… Trust you to find a way of screwing it all up!”
This evening while heading out to Ruby’s school so I could see her go down the “giant slide”, I spied a gal walking toward us. She was wearing a tank top. I was wearing a long-sleeved shirt, fleece and another coat on top. All I could think was, What in the world?! You can’t make it summer. Like Ruby trying to wear a swimsuit and shorts to school: “It’s sunny and spring. It should be warm!” Yeah. Tis the season. But it just isn’t happening. It’s alternately rainy, sunny and windy. Dress in layers and wait 5 minutes. This is the transition time, and it’s a bit rocky and unstable. Wearing shorts – I saw several offenders today – won’t make warm weather come any faster, either. Trying to force a flower to bud serves to ruin the flower. And denial is not just a river in Africa.
We went around together for a some months, but always with her miserable friend in tow. She was called Claire, had a pinched face and short hair and my friends always trying to persuade her to go out with me. It wasn't going to happen; she wouldn't even look at me. Just as well, I wasn't interested in her either. She was plain, mean and smelled of wet thick-knit cardigans. I'm failing to remember the third wheel, but she was going out with my other friend.
1 vidalia onion
8) It can teach patience and strategy skills, depending on the game(s) you like. We like games with a sense of story to them – funny characters, civilization building, Viking invasions – most of them have both elements of luck and strategy built in, and most of them take an hour or more to play. It’s been fun to watch the kids get better at playing our games and giving their mama a run for her money.
There is a broad consensus that Wales is divided into too many, too small, councils to effectively deliver services and that they should be reduced. A common suggestion is that the eight pre 1996 counties are the 'right' size.
It just hurts.
This is the beer that hop heads WANT and the masses crave. Great IPA qualities. The hops in this beer are amazingly intact. Front and mid body the citrus and florals seem to dominate the palate. Gritty pale, and caramel tastes appear. Finishes very rind-like with notes of berries and some dry spiciness from the rye malt. Very soft and mild, with a decent carbonation. Not extremely sweet; but very dry and bitter.
Not only do I have coffee back, but I have a jam-packed month. Yeah, I say that every month. It does not change the fact that it's true. Starting off the month my school semester ends, then I have the 5k. After that is mother's day with both of our moms, I start bike training, then the summer term starts up. Whew. I think I'll need another coffee.
Borrowing from a post by Stevie Mathieu, Stephanie is intent on telling us that current 3rd Congressional District Representative, Jaime Herrera Beutler, another who is of questionable conservative bona fides, was questioned on her view of the Clark GOP sanctions against Boldt and making sure to tell us her reply of, “constituents, not political parties, should come first.”
1) If you want to participate in this, just email me at onefineblessing (at) yahoo (dot) com and I will add you to the mailing list.
Months ago, a sweet blog friend of mine sent me all of these wonderful cards that she illustrated! I was so honored and thought that they were far too special to use them all. So we framed them in our kitchen! Thanks Analene!!! We thoroughly enjoy looking at them every day!
Then have the customer step to the rear of the vehicle and have them check their own brake lights, tail lights, signal lights, the back up lights and emergency flashers.
But he replied, “There is not a jar left.” Then the oil stopped flowing.
--Prudential Douglas Ellman Real Eastate
I can finally use the internet from my room. You can't even imagine how much it costs per hour. They're crazy °-°
8 March 2012
I hope you are all having a fabulous day! After today there is only ONE more day of tax season left at work! I can't believe the middle of April is already here...I am glad that the past 3 and 1/2 months have flew by.....YIPPY!!! I am so excited to work less hours a week and get some more crafty time in....and of course start working on building our home! Hubby and I are hoping to break ground hopefully in May!!! We are so excited!
But she will not speak. Threats and enmities would not mover her. A remarkable woman that, Hastings.
So, Cheryl got sent home yesterday evening following her court date. She was represented by two lawyers, who are also PNM MPs: Fitzgerald Hinds and Faris Al Rawi. The court date, as you well know, came in the aftermath of PSA Union Head Witless….sorry…Watson Duke filing a writ of habeas corpus. The cries have been consistent that Duke and the PNM are playing politics and using Miller for political mileage….that may well be the case…it certainly smells like it…but the UNC aint backward either. Already in some circles it is being whispered that Miller’s commitment to St. Ann’s has a political slant to it….and in a desperate show at defending the choices made by his Ministry Fuad Khan has come out making statements that can only be described as tasteless, judgemental and dangerous. Perhaps Khan is aware of the amount of anti-government sentiment that Miller’s predicament has created in the society and this is his form of damage control….but homeboy, you don’t go accusing people of politicking and then do the same thing yourself….going to the extent of implying in your comments what the State’s diagnosis of Miller is….In your comments Fuad, you imply that Miller has a serious condition. You indicate that she is an “ill patient”, but don’t reveal the diagnosis…you say too that she can look normal and and be triggered by a negative reaction, you imply by your comments that she has a personality disorder……
There was no reason to continue to carry the Chinese solider now that he was conscious Pitcher decided. He reached down and quickly slipped his folding knife from his right-front pants pocket. The blackened blade of the Benchmade Presidio flicked open with an ominous automatic click. The scout began to squirm. His eyes went wide again.
And then comes along the great Tun Dr Mahathir and of course not forgetting an elusive politician turned global business tycoon, Daim Zainuddin. They vocalized their reservations about Najib.
His eyes went wide again and then I shot him in the chest. He gasped and moved his mouth as if to speak. In my head he was saying “Ouch Charlie that hurt”. I laughed and shot him again in the head. I put my gun away and walked out the door. His office is in his house and he lives alone, so no one was coming. He had crazies in and out of there every day and he didn’t even have video cameras. Idiot.
Curses! Still, though, I was pleased with the result, and today, brush script has a campy appeal all its own (the "T" is mine). I'm still proud of this very 80s design, and it's always been one of my favorite secret pranks. Most of my classmates liked it just fine, though I heard a little griping about it being too "punk rock." There was some speculation about whose fingerprint it was, but everybody assumed it was a student's, most likely mine.
It turns out that the shop's name wasn't necessarily a reference to the recent Rock and Roll Hall of Fame inductees of the same name. After walking in and shopping around Miss Sexy Armpit told the owners how cool we thought the name was. The woman behind the counter explained that there's actually a gun and ammo shop in the back. If the one stop shop for all your firearm and flower arrangement needs is a becoming a thing, then Guns & Roses is the place you want to go to. The owners were super nice and our mom's loved their flowers (which were very reasonably priced compared to most other places and online shops by the way.) They even personally thanked us for our business - something that doesn't happen much anymore.
That set my mind to thinking. What would be a good first day back to school gift that I could give to my kids' teachers that's inexpensive?! That's when I thought of this. It's super simple, low cost and I think it conveys the message that I appreciate what they do.
I give it a 1 out of 5 "Forms", and that's only because of the Walken Cameo.
So there was this one guy, Brian. He wasn’t like us. He was out of shape, nearly blind, not nearly as nerdy, but it remained in his tiny brain that outside wasn’t all bad and that we should be getting more exercise. We lived in the same cabin. One time he asked me who I thought was cute. I told him about Amanda, without mentioning her name – a fatal mistake I still make to this day. The name wasn’t important to Brian though. He didn’t seem to care. That’s how I liked it.
Author Stephenie Meyer
It's not that much has changed since then -- all the basics are more or less the same. It's more that I am COMPLETELY out of my element. Not to mention that I was totally unprepared for an ICU experience when I was planning on a surgery rotation. Which has led to quite the overwhelming week. Not to mention that I was completely unprepared for the hours I would be keeping on a regular basis.
What I do remember – it is a night I will never forget.
I think further experimentation is in order. And as a good empiricist, I’ll need to record observations to have enough data.
In the meantime keep up the good work David.
Michelle T. Boone, Commissioner of the Chicago Department of Cultural Affairs and Special Events, spoke with me outside of the gallery, still sounding a little bit disheartened that she wasn’t old enough to be on the show before it left Chicago. Her favorite memory of Soul Train happened during Joe Tex’s performance of his 1972 hit single, “I Gotcha.”
Not strictly from Hollywood, but nevertheless from one of the most amusing films of recent years is the delightful Genevieve, from the British comedy of the same title. The music, written by William Engvick and Larry Adler, provides not only a charming theme but points up the situations in the film throughout. Music as a commentary has been especially notable in British movies, where it is frequently used to give special significance to story movement. Here, however, Percy Faith presents only the theme, a melody of immediate and lasting appeal.
The following day, I eliminated the horizontal option, figuring that if the vertical plane was the only one available, I might get to see that fully covered surface. The first two girls outside went right at it. I gave them stools, both to help them reach the top and to eliminate some of the jostling from the day before. There were only a few of us outside at the time and so I was really able to focus on what was happening. At least half of what they attempted to stick on the board wound up falling to the ground. That was strange. As I'd dismantled the horizontal cork board art from the day before, I'd been impressed with how most of the kids had stuck their tacks all the way through to the opposite side, while these girls were only managing to barely get the pointy part into the cork.
The number of photography-related apps on my iPhone is a prime case of my addictive personality. My latest craze is Fotolr PS. It makes quickie collages for quickie blog posts. This is my week so far in snapshots.
“Whatever it is, we’ll continue to support Justin Bieber’s career where ever this ‘new development’ takes him. Acting? We’ll promote him. Modelling? He’s still very cute, although not for long, considering that he’ll be growning more facial hair now that he’s a proper man.
That’s the Washington Post headline of an interesting and somewhat disturbing Thanksgiving Day piece by Lisa Miller. The column follows with pronouncements from African-American theologians and academicians who focus on “justice,” and Jesus as a class warrior, and this provocative gem from Obery Hendricks, a Bible professor at Union Theological Seminary: political conservatives who call themselves Christians but oppose government programs that help the poor are not, in any meaningful way, Christians.
With crisp white trim, I think either could work - and might look really nice. But, I have such a hard time visualizing exteriors! I'm not sure why I can picture fabrics, patterns, furniture layouts in my head - but, I have a much harder time when it comes to the exterior features.
Congratulations, Christina... you did it again :)
The suggestion is that the National Higher Education Fund Corporation (PTPTN), which provides loans to students pursuing their higher education, should be replaced by a fully subsidised system in which (most/all) students receive fully government-funded tertiary education.
Between them dips low
During my adult life, have only worked for governmental entities:
The dramatic Cliffs of Moher drop over 700 feet straight into the ocean. Hear the sound of crashing waves and marvel at one of Ireland’s most magnificent views.Muckross House and Killarney National Park
Shelves and shelves of ceramic bells and shoes...and a few toys that at one point were in "McDonald's Happy Meals". I think I see Odie next to one of the seven dwarfs on the top left shelf, where is Garfield?
Anyway, want to find out if you qualify to fly at iFly Singapore?
But the message doesn't seem to have got through to all the soldiers on the ground, some of whom can't resist throwing their weight around.
* Brando Eaton as Jeremy Smith
1995 The Queen Mother opened (in Hyde Park) three days of VE Day celebrations to mark the 50th anniversary of the ending of World War Two.
“Faith is the substance of things hoped for, the evidence of things not seen.”
Today, I finished training with Shirley for Transitional Coach. Monday I start with a couple of members already enrolled, and ready for me to follow.
“Ferne gave this Thanksgiving party once—she bought bales of hay for people to sit on and set up old army parachutes to shelter guests from the sun. We roasted a goat on the spit.”
Ladies? Any takers? Real live pit stained shirt from a real live touring musician. Highest bidder can own this beauty.
Yeah, I know everyone and her uncle loves this book, but it was one of my favorite books of the year. It was one of those books that makes me wonder why I'm even trying to write, when there are people who so, so, good at it. This book was sent to me by the publisher, Little, Brown Books for Young Readers.
My first ever attempt at making a molten lava cake, and also my first bite at one. I must wonder why I haven't made it earlier. It's like biting into a chocolate cake, then taking a sip from a cup of the thickest hot chocolate. You know, like the ones in Belgium where they make it with real chocolate and cream.
I was the one who booked the wedding venue, and I had to do it without my daughter even seeing it in photos…I know that she usually trusts my judgement and I really thought that I chose the best option available in my smallish town, but that doesn’t mean I wasn’t nervous yesterday when we went to view the site together.
Heat wok and put in vegetable oil. Sauté garlic and ginger until fragrant. Put in the white crab mushroom and bok choy. Stir fry for a short while. Add light soya sauce, Chinese cooking wine, sesame oil and salt to taste. Pour in a little water. Add corn flour and water mixture. Serve with steamed rice while still hot.
lay eggplant on the bottom of the dish, overlapping a little
Now the objective is not to target any group or corporate houses (both are important entities for growth of country), but surely both the parties should benefit along with those whose food needs should be addressed by the govt. I know there is lot at stake, but from the pictures emerging is that the farmer, poor and middle class are the ones who have more at stake. One’s issue is identity, another’s existence and the latter one’s is food.
Though she claims she never had sex at work, Dickinson, 41, admits that she met a Rikers inmate on her watch, a gang member from her neighborhood who had admitted to killing a rapist.
Templeton Emerging Markets Group Executive Chairman Mark Mobius said that Brazil’s government interventions in the markets might end up hurting Latin America’s largest economy.
Have people forgotten that life will always throw a roadblock in your path; whether it be the result of an outside force or one you created yourself? Making, accepting and forgiving mistakes made by either yourself or someone else is a sign of a person willing to acknowledge that there is something positive in everyone and everything.
The Hungarian AIPPI doesn't seem to have a website, though it does have a telex (has any reader of this blog ever used a telex?). Probably the best way to contact the group is by phoning +36 1 353 1661 or by faxing +36 1 353 1780.
My poor copy is a little battered. I’ve tried to protect it by taping the corners and spine, and here’s to hoping it’ll last. (Might have to get a hardcover at some point in life.)
Landscape (horizontal) orientation
Patience. Can we go back to that missed opportunity? Sometimes, But it takes courage, committment and fortitude. Does it work out in the end?
So after a terrible week fighting this flue, and ending it on a high note with a super productive day I'm giving out this coupon to all Designs by Jessie customers!!
I am sorry I haven't had a chance to post winners this week. I had to drive to Jupiter and the hotel stop Tuesday night had lobby email but not room email.
To spend next Christmas Day
Donating can not only help others, but also can leave givers with “feelings of empowerment, joy, and inspiration,” according to the executive summary of a 2009 working paper on Harvard Business School Working Knowledge’s website.
Monday. Waste.
* So; eating cauliflower is very healthy!
I wish there had been an assumption here that we already knew the traditional definition of ‘story’ – there are plenty of good books on it already. But I suppose defining, ‘knowing’ the rules is part of what the book promises to deliver. The statement on the front ‘know the rules so you can break them’ does point to this. Perhaps I was looking for sometimes more along the lines of: ‘you know the rules, now let’s break them’.
...is still something. When I was getting the picture ready for yesterdays post I did a little something else to it.
(gets out acceptance speech, approaches podium)
My first tutorial!
Does it get any better than this?! Yeah, it probably does. But it doesn't get any worse!!!
Tan Handbag - Kate Spade
In conclusion, if you do something bad, you’re actually hurting yourself.
I know i have been a a bad blogger of late, but i have been so busy with life in general. It was my birthday last thursday and i had a fabulous day and i got lots of pressies !! books money earings a coat and giftcards i felt so spoilt ! some of my gifts !
“Where do you need to take the limits off of God in your life?”
A RECOVERY ROOM
Cook until short ribs are tender, 2–2 1/2 hours. Transfer short ribs to a platter. Strain sauce from pot into a measuring cup. Spoon fat from surface of sauce and discard. Serve over mashed potatoes with sauce spooned over.
A few years ago, I was diagnosed with Interstitial Cystitis. It means that the lining of my bladder is damaged, and it's very, very painful. When it flares up, I'm supposed to watch my diet. Shortly after my diagnosis, a very pretty clinician handed me a six-page, double-sided, single-spaced document.
Accessories: pearls
My sentiment and image lightly contradict each other as my sentiment is a cheery goodbye but my image looks sad to leave, as this is my goodbye card to all my friends at my old job it really sums up my feelings about leaving!
Like going to be late for my own funeral kinda late.
Shut Up and Drive. That was the phrase that got the ball rolling (see my post called Shutting Up and Driving). Well, today I confirmed my first cake order. Yes, an official order. I'm gonna get paid to make a cake! Granted it's an order from a relative BUT it is going to be her gift to a friend's son. So technically it's a cake for someone NOT related to me. Yaay!!
I created 2 bead embroidered necklaces. The first is a necklace made of two components. The top features a crazy purple agate, and the bottom is an amethyst. It's a sheer coincidence that both stones start with "A" honestly... my type A part of the brain didn't plan that, for real. I used Nicole's Bead Backing in dark purple because I wanted everything to be matchy matchy too... yes, that was Mrs. Type A speaking.
A few holidays have some PVP requirement. This is fun to do on a PVP server of course, but it’s even better to group on a PVE server if you aren’t used to PVP. Some of these are:
Pancakes (Whole wheat flour) with blueberries, bananas, and maple syrup.
23 years later..
135. The blessings of friendship & fellowship.
Suddenly, he finds himself pitted against thousands of competitors in a desperate race to claim the ultimate prize, a chase that soon takes on terrifying real-world dimensions - and that will leave both Wade and his world profoundly changed.
Magazines
skip of the
In my just-published novel Light Bringer, two of my main characters found each other when they were searching for their birth parents. Those characters were truly a product of their upbringing and their birth. That is the whole crux of the story — who the characters are and why they were birthed.
(if you have rr's already, like a $5 one, do this:)
10. Last, but most certainly not least, is my family. I am here because of them and I would not be the girl I am today without each and every one of them.
And look!
Share your own affirmations in the comments section!
With being smart, looking for sales, using gift cards, and receiving some items as gifts, we have only paid about $50 out of our own pockets.
Here’s my ‘Read’ picture … I’m sure on a normal day I could do something more creative, but as I was in the kitchen, this is what happened. Too bad I wasn’t still reading Anna Dressed In Blood … the ketchup would’ve been fitting!
Matt Carrera
Now onto this week's awesome challenge. This week we are getting PUNCHY.
I logged into the host site about 24 hours after taking the test and saw the most perfect words ever: "Scores received from test center- Passed". Music to my ears. Better than Christmas morning! Now I have to wait for my lovely state to get the news and send me my license.
This year we will be planting a whole bed of them in place of potatoes. Being native to the Andes, they are relatively resistant to UK pests and diseases, only a handful of them were damaged by worms last year compared with our decimated potato crop.The tubers can be left in the ground over winter, or stored at home in cool conditions and replanted in spring. I am a lazy gardener, or at least time constrained; and Oca look after themselves and were one of our few successes this year. If you can source the tubers I recommend giving them a go.
Named this year by The New Yorker as one of the 20 best writers under 40, Adichie’s books include Half of a Yellow Sun, Purple Hibiscus and The Thing Around Your Neck. In 2008 the MacArthur Foundation awarded her their acclaimed “Genius Grant,” saying, “Adichie’s powerful rendering of the Nigerian experience is enlightening audiences both in her homeland and around the world.”
If you like salt with your margarita, salt glasses as follows: on a small plate or saucer, pour a bit of Rose’s or fresh lime juice, enough to just cover the bottom of the plate. You can also run a small slice of fresh lime along the rim of the glass to dampen it. Cover the bottom of another small plate with Kosher salt. Dip the rim of the glass in the lime juice, then in the salt to cover the rim. Pour in your margarita and enjoy!
“That,” said Rivals.com West Analyst Greg Biggins, “may be the biggest question of all: which one is it going to be? Nature’s most primal crucible will be the testing ground for 2026′s top rated prep football player named Clausen. It’s a tough question. Neither reproductive science nor recruiting can be one hundred percent exact, so all we have now are educated guesses.”
Cach's writing style pulled me deep into the story with its vivid descriptions and beautiful, smooth-flowing prose. I thought she did an expert job setting the mood and atmosphere for each scene entered into. However, there were a couple of times when it seemed that the details were done a little too meticulously, causing the writing to slightly slow in a few parts. There was also a minor over usage of exclamation points. However, both of these things may have been adjusted in the final copies and I thought that, overall, Cach had a gorgeous writing style.
Back to tracking in Weight watchers! I haven't been in the right frame of mind to do this for a while. But in the past few weeks I could feel all the gears shifting into place. I've been so. close. just. one. more. turn. And I'm there. I've already entered my breakfast and lunch for tomorrow (oats with almond milk, clementine and banana slices, wheat germ, honey, coffee & cream; and hummus, bread, veggies, an apple, extra dark chocolate).
I go to Fast Eddie’s for supper with Alex Petty. Walking back across town towards our respective accommodation, we find a single stiletto abandoned on the pavement. A few yards away is a poster advertising Jelly Wrestling.
Spy agencies know a few things about most of their male intelligence targets. They know that most men like sex (a lot), that most men are not always careful about who they have sex with, and that as a group, we men are susceptible to ego massaging.
Chaitezvi
To win this giveaway, you must "like" our Facebook page (there's a handy widget on the right hand side of the blog) and "like" Blissful Booty's Facebook page. After you've done these mandatory entries, you can get extra entries as well!
Very basic is style but I was experimenting with bright colours and papers. I'm trying to use up all my odd bits of paper and I couldn't find any other papers that co-ordinated with the busy and bold pattern here. It is sooooo not a paper style I would normally go for but I'm chuffed with the end result.
personal expense account for clothing/food, with a $125,000 business expense
Spain’s worst fear after the nationalization of YPF was that the move could ignite a chain of nationalizations throughout the region. A large portion of formerly state-owned companies in Latin America were acquired by Spanish corporations during the 1990′s privatization feast.
Why so disturbed within me?
I don’t have it in me to craft a post this morning.
25 Double-Unders
Some of the questions surrounding this group that I had to contend with were hard to answer. Did 1987 Topps (like it or not it is an iconic set) make 1988 seem a bit simple by comparison? Has 1959 Topps (a great design) overshadowed 1958 in the years since they were released? Is 2003 really that good or did it just look good compared to the previous seven offerings? Is 1972 really overrated or just a product of my disdain for popular things? I think there are definitely solid arguments to be made for both extremes on those questions. I feel I was fair in their placings, but feel free to voice your own opinion in the comments below. Either way, these sets are definitely worthy of being noted as above average Topps sets.
One year, the people kept turning up on top of the houses. I asked my daughter - she was 3 or 4 at the time - if she was moving them. She said yes, and I asked why they were on the roofs. "Because there is a flood coming, Mommy!" she said seriously. We love this little village, and add to it every year. This has become a new family tradition now.
But press on we must.
2. This Race
But that's the only way to be
it took a hell of a time to wake her. He told me I could sleep here, she whispered,
872. Gala Apple @ Home (Phoenixville, PA) 10:20 a.m.
Who ever said the colour blocking trend was about to die... Well, you couldn't be more wrong. For spring 2012 Gap is still all about unexpected colour combinations. The must have item to add to your closet? A pair of coloured denim, of course.
First, schools are operating under a few basic fallacies which have been accepted as "fact" by the fast majority of Americans, and therefore by a majority of our institutions, including our governments:
1440 D-X/17(B)/2002. “Shakespeare’s Queen Elizabeth: The Rhetorical Foundations of Politics.” Rochester Institute of Technology. Rochester, New York.
Roasted Cranberries
As soon as I saw that Ready Player one was about game geeks with strong links to the 1980's I was all over it and from start to finish I couldn't put it down. It's fantastic. I don't know if it's because the 80's are my era and games are in my blood and but I suspect it would be just as epic a read for anyone who doesn't share my history. It's just fantastic. The story telling is spot on and there are so many twists and turns that it's hard to put down.
Basically, it hypothesizes that parents are less happy than those without children while they are in the throws of parenting, but are more nostalgic and fulfilled in retrospect. It doesn't delve whether those without kids are without kids by choice or due to infertility, and I think this is a very important distinction since infertility is, from what I hear, really hard. The article spends quite a bit of time discussing why parents hate parenting and although I can see their points I do find some holes in the article.
By 1692, however, the complexities of the situation in 1641 had been forgotten and the children and grandchildren of those Protestants who had been targeted in 1641 chose only to remember those Catholics who had practised violence. Like many of those in the post-Troubles generation today, they had grown up hearing stories of horror, tragedy and the loss of human life; then, spurred on by King William’s victory and, of course, eager too to gain land and money at the expense of their Catholic neighbours, the Protestants of Ireland in the 1690s were determined to score a religious, economic and emotional victory over their Catholic compatriots. The Protestant Bishop of Derry reflected the majority of Irish Protestants’ mindset when he wrote in 1693, ‘it is apparent that the necessity of being so harsh was brought about entirely by them, because we know that either they or we must be ruined.’ In part, the anti-Catholic mood was based on the Protestant community’s memories of the unbelievable horrors and cruelties they had faced at the hands of the rebels of 1641; on the other hand, part of it was
new Women's magazines or
As gathered,Jim Iyke abandoned the award because of the bad image he garnered last year, especially his alleged N15million scam court case with an ex-girl friend.
I found myself physically throttling the book every time I read (again) that Edward’s skin “sparkled like diamonds.”
Contestant: Doctor.
*My husband had the flu.
My Oldest has entered his last year in the single digits. Wow! October 1 marked the occassion, but my October 9 blog is devoted to him.
I don’t want that disappointment, however there are a couple of things I need to find out first. One, is it more dangerous to use the shot, other than my extreme needle-phobia, does it in fact work faster, and will my insurance pay for the shot versus the gel.
vesper, secret-agent of chance
At about 20, after the game and good healthy Preheat barbecue a pig in the cage, good enough to eat, with polenta and pickles, as only in Maramures can eat, and peasant soup, an original recipe in our city and polenta dish with cabbage and pork roast and a dessert cake and homemade cakes, depending on your preference.
Every week my students tackled one or two writing exercises. The first week I brought in a selection of interesting objects - a broken bracelet, a wooden fox, a ship in a bottle - and asked them to come up with a story outline. They scratched their heads, they discussed, they wrote and crossed things out. ‘That was hard,’ said one lady. She never came back.
Pour some garlic salt and Lowry's seasoning on one side of the steak while you're heating up your frying pan, which should have been lightly coated with some olive oil, at very high heat. Once it's very hot, put the steak on, seasoned side down. Give it a minute or two, then pour the same seasonings on the exposed side before turning it over. Give it another minute or two--this sears both sides, which will trap the juices in. Then cook on low heat, turning the meat over every few minutes, until you have it where you want it.
In grammar, a negative word expresses the absence of something. If I say, "I have no flour for the cookie dough," I am telling my reader about the absence of flour in my pantry. This is called a negative statement.
Alice Cooper- School’s Out (School’s Out LP- 1972, single- 1972)
It is worth noting that Cita Information Systems’ Director, Kristoffer Bajok, who is known for his ‘flash’ lifestyle, is also widely regarded as James Masing’s proxy and nominee. He is certainly a business partner of the Minister for Land Development.
Onion (optional)
Private Bag X828
Tired of eating potatoes the conventional way? Fried? Boiled? Mashed? Or as a pottage? Why not try Tater Tot-O-Rama. It is interesting, delicious and really easy to make. Tater Tots are good for side dishes or as a great snack.
On November 19th, the focus of our activity was “A Food Storage Christmas.” We made Christmas gifts from our food storage. Several sisters showed us how to make the gifts look beautiful for gift-giving.
After two international competitions, I redirect my focus on my accounting profession. I worked in audit firms, whilst studying for my ACCA. Life was tough as an auditor, however, the experience from my hardship was rewarding. The experience that I have gained from audit work, helped me build up a foundation and a platform to be a prominent business consultant in future. I get a lot of satisfaction by helping my client to improve their business effectiveness and performance.
Muzzleloader – Zones 1, 1A, 2, 3, 4A, 5A, 6, 6A, 7, 8, 8A, 10, 11, 14 and 15: Oct. 20-28 and Dec. 15-17. Zones 9, 12, 13, 16, 16A and 17: Oct. 20-28 and Dec. 29-31. Zones 4, 4B, 5 and 5B: Closed.
My argument is that if there are other people that could surround Logan and Kalani, others who are a more positive role model, wouldn't it be worth the hassle to surround them with such people? Or is convenience worth the opportunity for them to figure out who they are?
Once I finished writing, I told God, "Ok. I'm gonna need your help to fall back asleep. My back has got to stop hurting. Mischa must quit snoring."
Can anyone think of anything 11-dimensional? Please?
For my cards today I used the Dec. Kit of the Month and a new release from Phyllis Harris
Hiding thy bravery in their rotten smoke?
If you're a fan of rich and delicious beers try Dogfish Head World Wide Stout if you haven't already!
How will sports work in an Equal Money System?
He tries again, seeing as I’m really focused on this new text.
Exciting stuff! I have posted the video of Tupac’s performance below – enjoy!
it's magic 'til we know how it works
Life is a game, play it.
In a very poor, rural town.
I was not a Kennedy fan, nor was I particularly concerned by events in Vietnam in 1962. College beckoned, and my friends and I worried only about proving ourselves well-rounded high school seniors. A bunch of us decided that what we needed to fill out our brag sheets was athletic experience. So we–are you ready for this?–we started a soccer team. We conned a rookie math teacher into being our coach, bought him a book about soccer, and went on to compile one of the worst records of any team in the history of our school. Since most of us were seniors, we didn’t care, but it must have been tough on the younger members of the team, especially on one of them, a kid named Larry, who already had a reputation as a kind of super nerd (a term we didn’t have then, by the way) and didn’t need anything else to apologize for. Physically, Larry and I resembled one another: we were overweight, wore our dark hair in very short burr cuts, and peered at the world through horn-rimmed glasses. Despite the fact that I avoided two of Larry’s more nerdish affectations, carrying a brief case and wearing a slide rule in a holster on his belt, we could easily have been mistaken for one another at a distance, and sometimes were.
Hawaiian Pizza
Do I hate anyone based on race? Nope. Never have, never will. Do I care that you hate me? Not really. It's your problem, and as long as you live in the past, you will have no future. But when things go down the toilet here, please lay the blame where it belongs: with the current government. Blame yourselves, and blame your utter devotion to living in the past, and hating for no reason.
At long last. I always underestimate how long these things are going to take. It was supposed to be finished by October, but the birth date came and went so I decided to make it for Christmas instead. At least it’s still Winter!
LEARNING FROM LADAKH – AN UPCOMING WORKSHOP IN INDIA
Given by Papa God, July 23, 2009
I was just listening to some songs on Youtube the other day, and I happened to think of a song I had not heard in a while, so I checked it out once again. R. Kelly's "Real Talk" is a VERY funny song.
6) STAR
Mostly because this phone actually has a silent feature... now I can finally text and play Words with Friends through all of my meetings instead of counting ceiling tiles and/or plotting a way to get a cameo on Modern Family. So really, it's a blessing and a curse.
Let me explain: what happens if I close my eyes, sit straight and look at the flame of a candle. I am aware of sounds, my breath, the object in front of me and my thoughts. Can it be that meditation makes me more aware of what is happening around me? Does meditation create the awareness of who I really am and how the world really functions?
Thursday evening we attended Spencer's Holiday Ball for his Battalion. We had a great time and enjoyed the company of others that were seated at our table. The chunk of the evening was spent at the dinner table where toasts were made, awards were given, speeches were made, slideshows were watched, dinner was eaten, etc, etc, etc...The informal portion (dancing!) began around 9:30, but we were too tired to stick around for that, so we headed home.
Sniffer dogs have been sent 200km from the capital Kathmandu to search for bodies along the banks of the river, which has now subsided, while police and army personnel hunt for survivors.
This is the America that was won for us by the nation’s Founders, and earned for us by the Greatest Generation. It is the America that has produced the most innovative, most productive, and the most powerful economy in the world.
Tunisian Uprising: Leading Sunni Scholar Yousuf Al-Qaradhawi Says to Ousted President Ben Ali: “You Idiot! It Took Four Weeks and Hundreds of Casualties for You to Get It?!”
I introduced Dionysus and Ebony(008) today. The pairing went very well, and Ebony made no attempt to chase Dionysus when he disengaged.
minhtii: Thank you for your heartfelt comment.
Deuteronomy 31:6
Deborah I need you to send me an email papercraftingstamper@gmail.com with your address so I can send your blog candy to you! I don't have your email or any way to contact you so I hope you see this! I will give you till next Friday the 21st to contact me, if I don't hear from you I will pick another winner. Please contact me ASAP :D
Tennyson Stephens - Keyboard & Vocals, Larry Ball – Bass, Windy Barnes - Vocals
1- This shipment came without specific order
Taking the ulamâ to account so that they at last dare to report the injustices and instrumentalization of Islam in the field of hudûd and, in the name of fidelity to the Islamic texts, to put out a call for an immediate moratorium emulating the example of ‘Umar ibn al-Khattab.
It was fun and I will use them again, though I don't know that it was really much easier than freehand art.
Like his brother from another mother, William Shatner, did last week, Mr. Nimoy turns 81 years old today, and he’s still running like the Energizer Bunny shot-gunning Red Bull.
I will also be entering this centerpiece to the Cricut Circle Monthly Challenge: APRIL MONTHLY CHALLENGE: Center of Attention Challenge!
Gliding on gentle breezes
Basically, all you need to know is that the plaintiff is arguing some statutory something about being a typical representative of the proposed class and Judge Stanley R. Chesler writing the opinion disagrees with one of their arguments stating:
I had gotten about halfway through the raglan increases when I realised the armholes were wonky! On one side, there were six leaves before the arm and on the other there were seven! Argh! So I had to frog back to the leaves and start over from there. I'm almost back to where I was before.
